like Yu-Gi-Oh or magic
wait what they kicked her out?!
I’m a 1.865S EB guy myself.  I know some guys that are pre farming now and looking to start fresh in a few days.  Do you ever run that play?  This crew has never missed for me.  Organizer is sharp and gets it done right.
my heart says I want to get a vaccine so I dont die
So see, you can either have nothing since your literal home is up in flames, or you can have these 2 denarii I found in my pocket. Your choice lmao
&gt; he talks   Okay so this totally spoiled me but I'm also heavily intrigued
No they aren't, stewie and fer have been rocking gem stilettos for months now
you've never seen his neck jerks? You 1% retarded yourself?
I've never seen the version with (allegedly) hilarious subtitles. By now I'm starting to think it never existed in the first place...
"You know that I'm 12, right?" Robin says to Batman.
I don't remember Ninja from Fortnite doing that 😠😠😠😠😠😠😠😡😡😡😡😡😡🤢🤢🤢🤢🤢🤢🤢🤢🤢🤢🤢🤢🤮🤮🤮🤮🤮🤮🤮🤮🤮🤮🤮🤮🤮🤮🤮🤮🤮🤮🤮🤮🤮🤮🤮🤮
Any update?
Really? I’ve been led to believe even a smaller amount of reclaim on there is pretty reasonable of a dose. I do also have 0 edible tolerance
Do you have any advice for us CowbellyRedditers?
Actually, I'm sick and tired of all the 'hard' champions. Every other jungler is a Lee Sin main, if you firstpick mid, you better not play anything thats weak against Yasuo/Zed, champions like Irelia and Kalista are beyond infuriating to play against. I prefer the simple champs.
[One of the mods is trans](https://reddit.com/r/chemistrymemes/comments/etequ1/_/fg47uhc/?context=1). [This post](https://reddit.com/r/chemistrymemes/comments/eyojjn/who_is_ent_and_why_is_he_gay/) helped to popularize trans pride in this sub. This site is incredibly transphobic, so it’s nice to be a part of a meme sub that isn’t hateful like so many are.
Hear me out. WhaT if you mounted the mirror lengthwise above the console. It’s will help make the space feel larger and brighter.
works great
What ????democrats saying the virus is a big deal = politicizing it,   while trump saying the fear caused by Democrats is a hoax = not politicizing the virus?? Very confused by your logic.
qhfrlekrhbfakejdf
Well best of luck to you all in France. We are all in this boat together.
Your account is too new, come back again later. Your account has to be three days or older to comment or to post, this is to combat spam.  *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/SmallYTChannel) if you have any questions or concerns.*
They must be saving the feature for the MG version. I just realized that Tierra’s the only Meister of the quartet to not have an MG suit even announced
You'd be right, it is platinum. Fun fact, catalytic converters release that platinum when the car is running so if you were able to shut down a busy highway overnight you could sweep up said highway and refine the dust and various junk down into actual platinum. You wouldn't get enough, certainly not worth the effort but interesting nonetheless.  Edit: Cody's lab on YouTube actually did a video on this, it's very fascinating and worth checking out.
you are good
Mentira q eu nunca te vi na vida   (Mas concordo com ele. quero nada com esse sujeito)
Kik: theeth52
I don’t see anybody messing with North Korea , and they only have limited land base capability . No comparison to the US nuclear triad
Yeah. Idk some were suggesting that's nuts. But we've been seeing reduced volumes for a few weeks now. Across the board staffing schedules in the ED are being changed, reduced staff and hours. People have been sent home during each of my recent shifts. Some of the units I walk by to get to my car have the lights off and little notices saying they're not operating.  Hope you're managing alright financially. I feel bad for some of my co-workers who make near minimum wage and are seeing a bunch of hours cut.
No words of wisdom, but I feel this. I try not to wish ill on people, but I can't tell you how often I've wished I had a ME/CFS "gun" to shoot people with. Dial up 15 minutes, or maybe 6 months, of how I feel every day and then watch them CRUSHED under the weight of it. Mostly doctors and the kinds of people who KNOW they know better than anyone how I feel and what I "need to do." Even though it all looks like total fucking crap, just the fact that you recognize the few good things in your life gives me hope for you. I try to do that, too. Sometimes successfully, sometimes not so much. I wish the very best for you, and for all of us.
Haha.  8 new posts within a minute.  I think its been confirmed.  The plague-of-the-apocalypse causes earthquakes
February was when the fires were all put out.
uhm excuse me have some respect for our founding fathers  its a dynastic republic
Was there a white board with it too?
Thats not the issue, the issue is the current game pacing and the time it gives rebels to reach lvl 8 and find all the 5stars
cops shot ants and a few birds.
It means "Beef Labeling Supervision Task Transfer Act" and it is one word because nouns can be connected in german
Already touched my face
Ah the sewer map
He didn't play his rookie season
It’s just one instance of a larger pattern and saying he was over optimistic is an over understatement. He downplayed this and the effects are lasting to this day. There are people currently organizing parades with candy because they think it isn’t a big deal. He then had the gall to claim he was one of the first to call it a pandemic.   You just can’t find a person who is this wrong this often. I mean last week he wanted this wrapped up by Easter. That right there is enough for people to say “hey it’s almost over. Let’s get back to it.”   Here’s a longer list of comments and tweets   Feb. 26: "Because of all we've done, the risk to the American people remains very low. … When you have 15 people, and the 15 within a couple of days is going to be down to close to zero. That's a pretty good job we've done."   Feb. 28: "I think it's really going well. … We're prepared for the worst, but we think we're going to be very fortunate."   Feb. 28: "It's going to disappear. One day, it's like a miracle, it will disappear."   Feb. 28: "This is their new hoax."   March 4: "Some people will have this at a very light level and won't even go to a doctor or hospital, and they'll get better. There are many people like that."   March 9 (tweet): "So last year 37,000 Americans died from the common Flu. It averages between 27,000 and 70,000 per year. Nothing is shut down, life &amp; the economy go on. At this moment there are 546 confirmed cases of CoronaVirus, with 22 deaths. Think about that!"   March 10: "And it hit the world. And we're prepared, and we're doing a great job with it. And it will go away. Just stay calm. It will go away."   March 11: "I think we're going to get through it very well."   March 12: "It's going to go away. ... The United States, because of what I did and what the administration did with China, we have 32 deaths at this point … when you look at the kind of numbers that you're seeing coming out of other
Hence why they blame this on England.
Not sure why I am writing this other than to offer help and knowledge. I am well versed in lawn care and have all the equipment and products you would need. PM with with where you are located and size of your lawn. Might be able to work something out.  Proof: Here is my lawn https://postimg.cc/KkWJSJ5V
How pigeons do you think your bird could take in a fight?
Ok cool. I’m just now upgrading my resident services tomorrow and haven’t gotten the shop yet
I remember reading somewhere that humans may contain a small amount of uranium.
A bit OT, but still about treatment: So 80% of infected are "relatively" ok but 20% go on to need hospitalization.  YouTube's "MedCram" has discussed the past two days (March 30 &amp; 31) about assisting a person's immune system to prevent *needing* hospitalization.  Yeah, the person gets sick but not to such a level. What was discussed?  Hydrothermal techniques--very hot temps to very cold temps to very hot temps...like Finnish saunas. NOT as a cure in any way, but boosting the immune system right when you need it boosted.  And no fancy anything required, except a working tub.  That even if that 20% is reduced to 15%, that's a reduction by 25% of the number of people hospitalized (that 5% less is 1/4 of the original 20%--and can make a big difference). Note: Ironically, we removed our tub last Fall.  So I guess HOT showers then cold--even if it helps just a bit, it could make the difference between "moderately bad" and "really bad"--and that may be enough.
Just add an RN to the name and you got Capricorn!
Thank you. And that's a great point!
This is a parody of another video. Like word for word
The bike has 12k miles in it. Sprocket condition is fine other than these surface blemishes
lmao i went straight to the comments :/  thx bud
Oh man that’s one of the best things I’ve seen in awhile, thanks for sharing.
 it's not that i have zero clue, it's Cus someone can explain it better than me, the said kotae. also, don't wanna waste time fightin on internet, it's just faster to send people hear and watch someone who IS really good at the game.  also, if you are salty, stay away from discussions lol
Hi, I'm interested!  [https://www.artstation.com/diegohenriqueart](https://www.artstation.com/diegohenriqueart)
Auf jeden Fall.
I stopped smoking and only do edibles and tinctures now. Technically if you want to be super healthy, the only thing that should really be going into your lungs is oxygen.   I miss flower. I miss the smell of it. I miss grinding the weed and passing my bong around. But dammit my lungs and throat are happier without it. And especially right now, it’s good to keep your lungs as healthy as possible!   Just a suggestion but I understand if you don’t want to give it up fully ;)
Haha they actually do this all the time!! Its just scary seeing the big ones try this on the small ones lmao-
Came here for THIS. Knew it had to be sprinkled in somewhere in the depths of these comments 🤣👏🏽
That's what overtime is for. As long as one person is at the door when overtime ends, everybody moves on to the next area. And you can leave early on the final door, you just get a worse grade for abandoning your teammates.
Finally some quality stuff in this reddit
Yay! Feet
sent, group 12
NTA  Your uncle gave them to you to keep and enjoy, not to give away or sell.  It sounds like you'll let your cousin play with the cards, maybe you can even give some to him one day if he gets into it (that's up to you), but for now, you can't be sure that he won't get bored or that his mom won't try to sell them regardless.
Kareem Hunt
no worries
I have had big red for 22 years; Based on my experience, they Have Always been rude! Somethings never change.
God damn it. Could you put in on your vendor. Sorry for the inconvenience
Do you claim birb as a dependent on your taxes?
NTA  Maybe it's because I'm a lot older now and tired of being pushed around by people's bullshit, but I feel like if it were my I would have corrected the niece and flat out told her her mother was "mistaken", because I have literally *never* heard of anywhere where guests are supposed to clean up after dinner.  Guests are exactly that. *Guests.* Not maids. Not contributing members of the household. Just guests. The fact that she had you cook dinner for everyone makes it even more ridiculous. What exactly are you the guest of? lol
Desert Khaki! I saw it and instantly wanted it, unique but not in an obnoxious way you know?
Thank you so much ❤
Perfect❤🔥👍
This is how I felt during my first zoom meeting today lol I couldn’t focus but thankfully most of what was going on in the chat was relevant to what the prof was discussing.
Hacking up lungs? People still trying to down play Corona.
[8]   - Ditto Requested: Relaxed --- - Pokémon Deposited: Bunnelby  - Nickname: BadlyDrawnRh  - Pokeball: Other  - Gender: Male  - Level: 12 --- - Home/IGN: Rhino  - GTS Message: Please trade Pokemon with me. Thanks in advance.  - Game Version: Sword/Shield  - Game Language: English  - Trainer Description: Red
Dildo out of pure gold
 The new order adds some clarifying language around what constitutes essential business and activities, and adds some new crackdowns:   * Use of playgrounds, dog parks, public picnic areas, and similar recreational areas is prohibited. These areas must be closed to public use. * Use of shared public recreational facilities such as golf courses, tennis and basketball courts, pools, and rock walls is prohibited. These facilities must be closed for recreational use. * Sports requiring people to share a ball or other equipment must be limited to people in the same household. * Most construction—residential and commercial—is prohibited. There are eight types of exceptions including for affordable housing, work on healthcare facilities, homeless shelters and certain types of public works projects.  * Funerals limited to no more than 10 people attending. * Childcare facilities may only provide care to children or dependents of people working for essential businesses, providing essential governmental functions, or performing minimum basic operations for non-essential businesses.  &amp;#8203;   The counties participating in these strict orders are:  Alameda, Contra Costa, Marin, Santa Clara, San Francisco, San Mateo, and Berkeley   ...  The other counties added that their original shelter-in-place mandates still hold: Residents may only leave their home for grocery trips, doctor's appointments and walks around their neighborhood.  ...  What is still allowed as per the order: takeout food and walking in your neighborhood or nearby trails for exercise.
Wentz is nowhere near any kind of HoF trajectory. Watson probably isn’t either
&gt; I was only going to get a few things  That's only is already a tifu.   I dont know in your country but here it is advised to go to shop for buy a lot of stuffs.
Me during COVID and watching this shitshow and other reality tv all day.
Don’t see it?
Can someone tell me what they're trying to do, without the CGI, and why in the world they think that one might work?
I got the mp5k and he got the CAMRS
Devs gave detailed explanations on what the mods do on official discord already.
I see my cello as an extension of my self. To me, it isn’t an independent entity, but more of a limb that I’m capable of controlling. So just as I wouldn't name my right arm, I wouldn't name my cello or any instrument I have. That's just my own personal philosophy.
👏👏👏👏👏👏
Dick just dry bro
Wondering which apartments got sent this??
hura, konecne sa vyplati nas skazeny skolsky system kde kazde decko co nevie co s buducnostou ide studovat pravo! :DDDD
That's rough, but understandable. It already felt like he was trying to squeeze this tour into an already packed schedule. Who knows when he, let alone the rest of TREOS, would be able to get that going again.  Casey or bust for me. I'm not interested in seeing the material without him.
I never thought a monkey could be so terrifying
Sure! What color is the pot?
Keadonger is the artist, thank me/send me hate mail later
r/Subaru would dig
*CR7 QUARALHO*
There's a type of film that you can buy it called "hydrographics"
If you're talking about Eternal it's due to the TAA they use or dynamic resolution.  Then off dynamic resolution in the video settings and turn sharpness up to 60 also in the video settings and you should be good to go.
I'm I North America I'm afraid but thank you.
Hopefully it will put a whole load of self centered environmentally unaware pricks off flying to foreign parts ever again and most of those planes will become redundant permanently.I for one would welcome the chance of never encountering an American or Japaneese tourist on the streets ever again.
&gt; Yeah I can see why, youre on the verge of white supremacist/ethnostate, but that is a Quebecois de souche for you.  I'm not on the verge at all. Québec solidaire bud 😷  You see? We are who we are. Stereotypes exist for a reason. I've always been this way and probably will remain so, despite the tremendous pressure and attempts to shame me coming from WASPs and their immigrant imports. You won't assimilate me to your suicide cult, and I will be sure to warn anyone in Quebec considering moving here about just how pervasive and aggresive the two-faced xenophobia is.   I seriously don't mind that you're xenophobes. What bothers me is that you pretend you're not. It's incredibly obnoxious.  &gt; I gotta ask, why did you come to Waterloo if youre that into anti assimilation. Tho kinda ironic since Waterloo pretty much destroyed the french supremacy that used to exist in Europe.   I was born in KW. I didn't choose to come here and now that I have the financial and career prospects to leave, I am doing so as soon as possible. Not ironic at all, Waterloo is a bastion of progressive WASP nonsense.   &gt; Loi 101 stop a lot of people from going in english school, they had to pay stupid amount of money just to learn english. Plus they had that loi 104 just to screw people a bit more cuz why not  Based. Before you ask, I also support Loi 21.   &gt; a more sensible thing to do is just not forceful destroy peoples culture and not block immigrants.  That's not how WASPs function, first of all. They are incessantly aggressive with their forced assimilation. You're trying to do it to me right now, calling me all sorts of buzzwords that basically only exist in English to shame people who go against their way of doing things.  A sensible thing to do is stay the fuck home, have kids and raise them in their culture.  &gt; Nah lol you see i complain about Anglos and French eradicating their language, loi 101 being one of them.  Loi 101 was also about protecting the French language in Quebec. As were the follow-up additions.
That deserves a triple fuck-damn at least!
I’m hoping they change the puns with updates
😀
Anyone in NH willing to do the same? I am desperately trying for month to grow something named GNNUNAMGHT
What a wholesome post. Thank you vanilla god.
There is a betta in there as well. It looks like a giant, actually very similar to my big guy... I cannot
You’re not wrong
congrats
I sent you a PM and I can help you out!
holy mother of pearl
Ahhh this is so pretty!!
I don't know who would be happy to admit that
Amazing body and boobs
Nice
Alright!!!!!
Y'all fuckers going to work at 840... I hate you
Seems correct to me.  Congrats, LBU, Alabama! The only team in all of cfb with this title.
Smart dad. Not taking a high risk. He should at least be a good parent and pay for a test
Check the tire too, Make sure nothing is rubbing against it out of sight where you can't see.
Such a sweet voice!
Umm Rumple for one, he is one of my favorites but he was abusive like Regina. Zelena and Hook. All three of them got fans who justify or ignore they're behavior plenty. Unlike Rumple, Hook and Regina worked to better themselves and Zelena was all over the place. Im a fan off all of them but I take the good and the bad. If you want to call out abusers call all of them out not just one.
because it makes you reflect about life and that's not cool
Yes we did ;)
One job
Not my fridge, but I think we might have the same daughter. Hmmm...
I have his dying scream as the pendrive unplug sound
Like giving us more secure, more accurate, readily available, and easier process? Yea, agree.
lol I wear a backpack, but that may not be the most professional
Playing on low graphics all the male bearded npcs look like the women from the stoning scene in monty pythons life of brian
I 100% agree I love listening to my fiancee no matter what she's talking about
Sorry, you don't have a right to view porn/steam /discord on the schools network.  Not illegal and in fact it's incredibly common.
😂😂😂 yeah
My last playthrough of madden 19 on all madden, i lead the jags to a perfect 16-0 with bortles but lost the first playoff game, next season the eagles go 16-0 but lose to me in the superbowl with a wild card jags team lol.
I wonder if he just renamed his account to [deleted] instead
Thank you!
You're right though, with teenage boys it'll be gone quick! My buddy's mom used to keep her basement freezer full of frozen pizzas, because it was the hangout house for our group.
...where's the pup?
Not a good look tbh
Forward or reverse ?
Berlin is working fine, for me anyway.
I feel like your suggestion of a pact of the Arch-fey would be cool and a bit more on brand with the idea I had in mind. I'll have a talk with my DM and see what she thinks too.
it. looks. so. good. it’s like haunted zyra but edgy and i’m dying for it.
Im not sure if i saw this before sooo
Welcome to /r/HistoricalAITA. Please feel free to leave your thoughts and judgements on the situation presented to you by the author, but ensure that you remain courteous and partipate in good faith.  If you are commenting, please be sure to start or end your comment with the Abbreviation for your judgement based on the following:   * **YTA** = You're the Asshole;  * **NTA** = Not the A-hole;  * **ESH** = Everyone Sucks here;  * **NAH** = No A-holes here;  * **INFO** = Not Enough Info   *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/AskHistorians) if you have any questions or concerns.*
14days quarantine on the door step and you’re clear to joking 👍🏼
The guy is insane.  I can only assume he's conflating "political correctness" with fuel efficiency?  So he wants car makers to build heavier cars (that's the safer part?) that *burn more gas*...and that's going to be better for the environment???
Early internet memeing at its best.
Awkwardly, I called my son ‘Monty’ which is my Dads nickname (really christened David, but only his mum and sister called him that)  Now when they come to stay at our house for a few days my Mum confuses the heck out of my 7 yr old son, by shouting ‘Monty, do you want a coffee?’ as oddly, shes the only one who ever refers to him by his nickname as the rest of the house either calls him Dad or Grandad!  It drives my son crazy because  A) he hates coffee and  B) he says ‘it’s not even Grandads real name!’ Indignantly 😂  Sorry Dad for stealing your name (even though I know how proud you were at work that first day, telling everyone I’d named him after you x x 🥰)
I agree, good stuff.
haha oh I WISH I had cookies right about now. I would eat the whole package if I did though, so I guess it's good that didn't happen =D
poor boy... sweet inocent boy..
The air nation are pacifists so they dont. The other commenter mentioned earth rumble six but thats not the same thing.   An agni kai is basically a challenge for honour, which is something very integral to the fire nation (at least during sozin—&gt;ozai’s reign). It’s more ritualistic and/or spiritually significant than earth rumble 6.  A bunch of earthbenders with their meme gimmicks like Fire Nation Man make it more akin to Televised wrestling.   You could compare an agni kai to a fight like pakku and katara have in book one, but again, there isn’t any cultural significance like an agni kai— what with the invited spectators, scheduled time and all that.   So nah, only firebenders have that sort of organised duel for honour that is the agni kai
Went by the water bottle
Got a reliable source on what happened there?
I mean to be honest we paid for the one taught in class if it comes to it they may just give us a refund and cancel the class itself. I’m gonna be contacting them over the course of the quarter. I hope they don’t cancel it. I’ve staled my entire 2nd year on this.
Now imagine being an elementary teacher and being asked constantly if you're going to be holding Zoom meetings.  Where parents will all be watching in the background. I'm really struggling with hosting these as I feel obligated. I want to see my students, I want them to see their friends. Don't get me wrong. But it's all very stressful as a socially anxious person.
&gt;Any animal does that if you raise it. Cows do it, chickens do it, pigs do it.  A puppy that's never seen a human in their life would warm to one far quicker than a fucking piglet mate, how dense are you? It's an evolutionary fact that dogs evolved from wolves to be our companion, as it was in their best interest to do so. No other animal has the emotional intelligence and ability to read a human's emotion as a dog. A pig can't tell when a human is in a bad mood. A dog CAN, and goes out of its way to cheer us up. Stop talking shit.
Do they still have the husk?
Mmmeeeeeeeee
It was nutso. I am dying for season 4 already.
There was video. [Here is the Twitch Archive.](https://www.twitch.tv/videos/579953487)  I assume it will hit the site later.
They are still totally adorable! Mom has the look of a pig that's been through it. 😄
Go to FaceBook. You can find arguments there.
Someone did this to me one.... and I don’t lock the doors.
Well helo out, I'm Russel
I hate the motor city football. If they went with FTP or Defend the Den I'd buy.
Bf1 has 8 extra maps, less weapons, less vehicles, no solider customsation at all and you had to pay for all that  Bf1 also had invisible soldiers, varying gun mechanics and has hitreg issues the entire time (more so after dice LA took over) hell one of reasons I stopped playing that game was because of how awful the hitreg had become. I take it you aren't gonna include in this weird "comparison list" the fact that OCE servers were functionality broken for 6 months? Bfv has had some issues but an entire region wasn't able to play the game for 6 months like in bf1
I didn't know this just because I keep such good care of my bullet throwers.
Join us. Join us. Join us.
"Only the educated are free" that's surprisingly deep for a fortune cookie
Sounds like Matt is jealous......
Hellooo I'm 20 M gay, Pakistani but born and raised in the US if that matters at all. Feel free to message me
Reusable bags too - they're banned in this alternate universe
Before the pandemic there was nothing wrong with anyone selling a home made anything on KIJIJI. Yes people do not know how to use masks correctly wether legit or home made. they should be educated.
Me too :(
I'm curious to see where they go with it. I just feel it would’ve been a good way to pick up after AoS in a weekly format rather than in movies. I'm gonna miss Marvel TV :(
Yes you can, I got lottie and digby!
It’s actually pissing me off because i did challenges and progressed through the tour of duty and it says I’ve rank up but I haven’t gotten my rewards and I can’t gain xp
So the teen must have a child?
So... they did this oppositional defiant thing a couple years ago. #nothingnew
I see the KJPs are leaning into their ridiculously photoshopped flowers thing (@sarahkjp’s latest of their house is.... a lot)
aaaayyyyyeeee this one did his research
Please, please give us the ability to mute people on PC. Don't know how many times i've had to take my headset off bcuz people have hot mic's going in their mouth.
Minor Marine adjustment: if you want to maximize Smart Guy stuff while having some *potential* for running and gunning training, you could consider going Linguist and angling to go Radio Recon.  That way if you blow out a knee or get sick of sleeping in the dirt, you get out with a Top Secret security clearance and Arabic or Chinese or Korean language skills, etc. *If* you qualify they'll teach you a language from scratch, and language school and a little paperwork gives you a full AA degree.  I was a Linguist before going officer, and a number of buddies of mine went Radio Recon. Not at all saying it's definitively what you want, but it's another one to add to your homework.
I found one of their profiles, click on their lost recent comment, and saw the lower half of one of the photos. Jesus.
Cool, but in the custom configurator, there doesn't seem to be an option for the standard cables for the 24 pin ATX cable, only "pro compatible".
I can do dark souls 1 or 3  _cough_ sry. Remastered I meant
This alone makes Quarantine worth it
Shooting in your backyard and not disturbing your neighbors, hunting, home defense, and indoor range shooting, just to name a few.  Please tell me why law enforcement and military should be allowed to have better means of protection than an average civilian. Is your life less valuable?
It’s a left turn on your typical intersection if it’s red I downshift all the way to first and wait for it to turn green, once green I stay in first and usually accelerate through and while counter steering left, I lean my upper body to the left. Same process when green except I slow down a bit and downshift. If there’s anything I’m doing wrong (which I’m sure there is) please let me know!
 #Tara Reade says she was sexually assaulted by Joe Biden, but corporate media is more concerned with protecting Biden than covering her story. So we're amplifying her voice.   #[Follow Tara Reade on Twitter.](https://twitter.com/ReadeAlexandra)  ---  [**Donate to Bernie 2020**](https://secure.actblue.com/donate/redditforbernie)  [**Register to vote**](https://vote.gov/) — and as a Democrat, if your state gives the option — so you can vote for Bernie in the primary. Even if you think you're registered, or have voted before, check your registration to be sure. It only takes a minute.  [**Make calls to voters in upcoming primary states.**](http://berniesanders.com/call)  [**Send texts for the campaign.**](https://berniesanders.com/text/)  ---  These states permit 17-year-olds to vote in Democratic primary elections and caucuses if they will be 18 by November 3, 2020: AK, CT, DC, DE, HI, IL, IN, KY, MD, NM, NE, OH, WV, WY.  ---  #Subscribe to /r/OurPresident for Bernie 2020!  ---   *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/OurPresident) if you have any questions or concerns.*
Jealous that she’s dead or that she is having sex
this is some 2016core normie shit
'in theory' it lacks the normal damage mod that would be on other gears, thus putting it in balance with other gear.  in practice since the power of skills people get talisman for tends to be through the roof already, this shoe makes that output very absurd (like, say, Chaos's Genocide Crush that can do MORE than her 2a with talis and runes, and that's BEFORE having this shoe)
All I know is if it wasn't for Osorio and we would have won the group in 2018, we would have been on the easier side of the bracket with Croatia, best chance at a deep run and ready to spank that Croatian ass again. Thanks Osorio!!  [Favorite celebration that year.](https://www.jornada.com.mx/2014/06/24/fotos/a11n1dep-1.jpg)
Is this everything that was in 3dsiso?
PM'd
I use to play one of there games on the Ds but then the cartridge stopped working and I could no longer play it
my FC friend said it best "if it's not 100% it's 0%"
You can't turn them on.  Disappointing!  (Yes, they are invisible to human eyes.  I just want to click the boxes.)
 Hello u/Dudely-Llama,   Thank you for your submission to r/agedlikemilk. Unfortunately, it has been removed because you did not provide a reply with a valid explanation in time. ---  Read the sidebar rules and guidelines, and if you still feel this was done in error, please [Contact the mods here](https://www.reddit.com/message/compose?to=r/agedlikemilk&amp;subject=Expired%20explanation).
Gave **Safe &amp; Social**
Read up on any man who completed hair transplant. They say they have never felt that good 3-4 months post op when new hairs fill in. Some say better than wedding, graduation , dream job. Because nothing is more important to society and your own self worth than your appearance. Why do people en masse talk about” that feeling after a fresh cut “. When you look good, the feeling is as equivalent IMO as man growing wings and flying. Looking like Chad is another thing entirely. Closest thing to a superpower humans will ever know
Hello, trader! Your post is up and running. Here are a few tips to minimize your risks when trading in Let's Go Pikachu/Eevee! and Sword/Shield:  1. Avoid PM trading. Most scammers place other users in private situations to avoid having their actions seen in public. Also, note that for your trade to count for flair, every part of the conversation should be public so that all details can be confirmed. 2. Verify who you are trading with. Since another random player can coincidentally use the same trade code that you and your trading partner is using, it is important that you double check that you are trading with the right person. 3. If you are trading shiny Pokémon, please make sure that your post and other users’ offers contain the [full details](https://www.reddit.com/r/pokemontrades/wiki/rules). This is to provide more visibility so you know how the Pokémon you are trading (for) was obtained. If you see any posts that do not have the full details, please report it so that the moderators can be aware of the situation.   *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/pokemontrades) if you have any questions or concerns.*
is there a subreddit for porn for kittenwithdabs
Felt it here on the north side of Spokane too
the bleeding acoustic
How much?
My pc used to look like this. Never again.
A check for 1 trillion dollars. Boom, almost infinite money 🤑😂
Should have made it clearer in the title.
It's funny how smart you seems to think you are all while you fail to realize there are people who only make enough money to survive. Keep it sharp there bud.
Hvorfør stænger Svenskera ikke skolere?
That's a pretty drastic misrepresentation. Both the Bf 110 G-2 and He 219 are better low altitude fighters than the P-47, and better CAS to boot.  US aircraft that are actually good fighters at low altitude tend to make mediocre CAS, and vice versa. The P-47 is a miserable low altitude fighter. The F6F is alright, but carries substantially less payload. The best low altitude fighter the US gets is the P-63, which only carries at most two drops worth of ordnance, and only 500lb bombs at that. Corsairs are a middle ground, but have fairly limited payloads.  Meanwhile on the German side, the Bf 110 G-2 is a better fighter than half the US CAS lineup, as is the He 219. Fw 190 F-8 is a veritable swiss army knife of ordnance options and still flies and fights like a 190 when clean, Ta 152 C-3 is a monster in a dogfight and carries a centerline MK 103. The Me 410s are roughly on par with the P-47 in terms of dogfighting, so not *great* but they come with turrets, dive brakes, and either twin MK 103s, a BK 5, or two separately-released 500kg bombs.  German CAS is not suffering at all, people who think so have not actually given both US and German CAS options a fair evaluation.
To be honest I played worse games morality wise when I was his age but to be fair the graphics was'nt as good so even if I saw blood or undergarment I would sometimes not be sure what those were lol
Who cares about slaves who can't even stand up and speak for themselves without their livelihoods ruined, organs pulled out, or crushed by tanks?  It's like getting a battered wife to talk about domestic violence
[Here is an interview that kind of confirms it being in the Metroid timeline.](https://shinesparkers.net/interviews/idzuki-kouji/)  Even if we don't count that feat, my point still stands that Samus kind of solos. She's at least small star level via being able to defeat dark samus, who survived the destruction of dark aether.  And as far as I know, non of the MCU villains are MFTL+, so Samus still speed blitzes.  Her being teamed with Doomguy and Master Chief is overkill.
I rolled my ankle pretty hard to day and was wondering about ankle straps, how comfortable are they? and did you need bigger shoes to wear them?
Complete
you are killing it right now
Unwanted pregnancy is not going to stop because of Coronavirus, but if peoples’ “faith” stops because they can’t go to church then you know there’s a problem..
Olives and pineapples though?
NTA. Your uncle knew exactly what they were worth when he gave them to you. His wife knew too. Their daughter is making a plain money grab here. Don't feel bad. It's telling that she's asking you for the cards, not her son.
THIS OS THOUGH
Post are not marked nsfw for the reason that you think they are
he's confusing "vaccine" with "cure"
Close your eyes and point in any direction. Send some there.  Repeat over and over agin.
Have fun going where ever you want and whenever, that’ll show us!
very true, nothing like getting a soggy pizza full of sauce thats not cooked thoroughly.
What are the sources on some of these? Like for example the lightning one and the war between the Earth Kingdom and Fire Nation?
Check out this link.  http://www.americanwarlibrary.com/theduck.htm
Yummy
Does Ashton miss bryana?
I wanna see the target too my dude!
"Let's make sex ... difficult!"
We are, just that I haven't experienced happy like this and as soon as I got it, hahaha.
Very worrying that you'd have any basis to believe her "prank"
It's fine, her bike gave her a nice hug at the end and made sure she was ok.
They deep fry watermelon. Which is surprisingly good 😊
You appear to be good at it.
https://www.reddit.com/r/HuntsvilleAlabama/comments/fsgyc9/registering_a_new_car/  Sounds like renewal deadlines are being extended
Red
I see at least one copy in every second-hand store I go to in my travels around Austin, San Antonio, and Houston.
Thank you!! I’ve been trying for so long that when it finally happened I panicked and chose my chomby but now I’m regretting it and wish I’d chosen my draik! Ok well - there’s always next week now that I know my time!
Sexy &amp; smiling
I mean who would ever do that?
humans are different because we dont have claws or big hooves to kick animals we have the most intelligence of all the animals so we can create tools to overpower them in combat and thats the reaason why you can walk freely outside without a lion or some other creature killing you. its because we came so far as a species and getting to the top of the foodchain.  so to answer your question if i had the tools to kill the animal and it was a death or life situation i would absolutely kill the animal with ease
Why did it get boring? I've only heard positive and fun things regarding the social aspect of casual relationships.
Someone who had high expectations after watching the first film 10 years. I was ready to walk out of the theatre if I hadn’t paid 25 bucks for my ticket.
Another quirk to the braced pistol world to keep in mind is that vertical foregrips are not allowed.
Just a stupid drawing I made in mspaint one day
Remember that OP said 9000 Euros, which is rather more than 9000 dollars...   You can definitely get a good upright piano for much less than that, and a basic level piano player isn’t going to be able to tell the different between a decent, good, and very good piano anyhow, assuming they’re all in tune. Obviously that is very much not the issue here; the issue is that the piano was purchase at all and the relationships involved. But that 9000 euro price tag really shocked me!
Anything but county or like hard edm
Yeah they’re working real hard on stopping those school shootings.
Gotta be it right? Didn’t feel like much buying aside from EOD.
Use ReadCube Papers. Thank me later.
So he’s a Democrat. Republicans don’t believe in public health.
Their relationship screams delayed Stockholm syndrome to me. I get that it's not supposed to be, but the Cinderella arc didn't provide enough resolution to the kidnapping, humiliation, and torture, imo.
If only...
Chatted
Where is this right now ?
I have marked this listing as Complete.  *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/GunAccessoriesForSale) if you have any questions or concerns.*
Hey there, /u/Civext!  Thank you for your submission, but we are removing your post:  Rule 3 - No limited scope or easily searchable questions.  We believe this would fit better as a comment in our [Daily Question Thread](https://www.reddit.com/r/NintendoSwitch/search?q=author%3AAutoModerator+Daily+Question+Thread&amp;sort=new&amp;restrict_sr=on&amp;t=day), so this post has been removed.   Some types of questions that are better suited for our Daily Question Thread include:  * Questions covered in the [subreddit Wiki](https://www.reddit.com/r/NintendoSwitch/wiki/index) * Questions that could easily be answered by [searching /r/NintendoSwitch](https://www.reddit.com/r/NintendoSwitch/search?q=&amp;restrict_sr=on) or Google. * Questions that promote simple or yes/no replies. * Most tech support type of questions.  If Discord is more your speed, check out the #switch-help channel in our [Discord server](https://discord.gg/switch).  If your intention was to create a discussion post instead, then please ensure that you have written in sufficient detail, included some thought-provoking questions, and actively encouraged other users to discuss the topic at hand. Once you have made these changes then please feel free to submit a new post. ---  If you have questions or objections about this removal, please [reach out to us in modmail](https://www.reddit.com/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2FNintendoSwitch&amp;subject=Removal%20Objection%20or%20Question&amp;message=%5BPlease%20type%20your%20message%20here...%5D%0D%0D%0D%0D%2ADO%20NOT%20edit%20or%20delete%20anything%20below%20this%20line%2A%0D%0D%2D%2D%2D%0D%0D%2A%2ARemoval%20Notes%20for%20Moderators%3A%2A%2A%0D%0DPost%20title%3A%20Did%20I%20overpay%20for%20my%20switch%3F%3F%0D%0DPermalink%3A%20https://www.reddit.com/r/NintendoSwitch/comments/fsgiu4/-/%0D%0DContent%20type%3A%20submission%0D%0DRemoved%20by%3A%20Ganrokh).
Shrek, you rock!
His friend said in Russian, "don't do this anymore"
Midir for me. Still haven't beaten him yet, he just doesn't lose any hp
All the way back
1. Pretty much most of the 1 time players: Nick, sophie, Ben, Wendell. Also have been rooting for Tony and Sandra. Honestly though the whole cast are gems.  2. In a heartbeat  3. Answered this somewhere else but Chai Latte. Also 2 best flavours I've ever made are a Christmas spiced caramel and gingerbread one, and a cheesecake flavour
Isn’t this Midas room
Is this from sportfansworld?
Where’s his leash?
and fedex will?
€5 with mayhem? I’ll pm
I wish.
Brilliant. Appreciate you.
Lava gun for stun lock!
Wait Lime? Lychee? I just started 4 days ago and I haven’t seen these fruits besides buying some like from someones market box
Golems sometimes have a problem with getting pushed by a water stream’s lowest height. He may still actually be standing on the corner of one of the dirt blocks, since it’s hitbox is a little larger than you’d expect. Just a bit of advice: I wouldn’t drop them into lava as there’s a chance you will burn the iron ingots in lava. Use signs in a diamond pattern with lava on top so that the lava is at the same level as the golem’s head. Edit: Look up 0ld Guy Iron Farms on YouTube.
That's not even rap though
Thank you!!
ah, makes sense
Lol that’s not how VIX works. Yikes
That sentence necessitates that the shot be taken from ambush.  You can’t just take the last half of a sentence and say the first half doesn’t count.  If I was you I would feel ashamed for making such a bad point.
David, I don't wanna hear anymore about the coins with holes in them!
Hi there! Your post does not meet the minimum length requirement of 100 characters. Please elaborate on your thought to get the discussion going! [Click this link and hit send](http://www.reddit.com/message/compose/?to=/r/infj&amp;subject=Automod%20action%20needs%20review&amp;message=I%20have%20lengthened%20my%20post,%20please%20review.) once you've edited your post so the mods can review it.  In the meantime, you are welcome to head over to [our main chat channel](https://www.reddit.com/chat/r/infj/channel/341899_9129ba0fb42b8ef5711e8bb39fccf901fe9bf58e) to talk to people in real time :)  Please note: intentionally attempting to bypass our automod bot will result in a ban (rule 1).  -XOXO ❤️ Automod  *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/infj) if you have any questions or concerns.*
And..... it crashed.  &amp;#x200B;  Instead of Dodo Code I'm opening up the island to friends.   Add me (see code above) and you can visit by searching for friends.
east coast, you right on time!
Well... I mean, if your "worst moments" are grooming, sexually abusing, and exploitation of other people maybe you are a bad person.
With his gloves being coronaviruses
When I get knocked out, I see numbers like a robot. I see whole lifetimes. Dead kids, everything
At least he flat out offed the guy. No pussy footing around it and letting him live to come back and be a pain in the ass. Just a swift execution that was deserved and satisfying.
thanks
Big bro was always smart. Always. One day My brother was doing homework. He was like 16/17 years old at the time. He takes a *black* marker, and begins highlighting. He actually looks at it, shakes it, and says “this is a really sucky highlighter!” My mom looked at him and said “that’s not a highlighter stupid that’s a black marker!”   It’s been a few years but we still laugh from Time to time
🐯 🐅 🐯 🐅   Lol!!!!
Damn, that’s a cool piece.
I’ll definitely enter, count me in
Don't lie.   Some years it's four times!
I might be wrong but I think that model # is a Tracfone only model.
Riesling makes up probably 30% of all the best wines I’ve ever had. And this was in the top percentile of that. Wish I had more to revisit it over the years.
Oh my god that’s fucking sick
You're welcome, and yes the case should come with the ring movement holder.
I’d also like them to expand on the Blade system, because I found the builds and abilities pretty fun. I also dont mind how having Blade Affinity allowed for more quests and such, I just wish progression wasent always halted and the requirements werent so steep.
I’m trying to implement that but other than that all the vids I’ve watched just say play more. I’ve got like 50 hours playing time
And so is my life....😐😑😔
Everyone's talking about the smell but no one mentioned your gonna look blazed as all fuck when you get back in the house. If your parents are awake to smell the weed on your clothes then they will notice their childs eyes went from Caucasian to Asian...trust me on this hahaha
Yuh brat
Your {{type}} was automatically removed, Kobazaki. Currently we are only accepting users with accounts older than 2 days. Please take this time to familiarize yourself with [the rules](https://www.reddit.com/r/ACTrade/wiki/rules).  *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/ACTrade) if you have any questions or concerns.*
god damn !!!!
I know I made a typo in the title
I mean... you do understand the significance of one red card, right?  I'll gladly accept your assessment of two.
i have chat mode off activated
Yesterday I decided to play around with guns I don't normally use (prowler's one of my top guns), and guess how many selectfires I ran into that match.
I picked moth because I used to eat my clothing
I haven’t forgotten about you just across the border. Don’t forget about us it’s just us out here!
bro you can’t even afford a single share.
I killed the cactus, which hurted me with its thorns
a lot of women actually prefer a smaller package
Thank you :0
After 3 nights of heavy farming, I got 100 more bait ready and tried my luck with the Nook Miles islands. 1st one I went to, climb up the cliff, and it was already there waiting, no bait need! Guess I’m stocked up for the next rare fish lmao.
And essential oils
I wouldn't, but you can if you want.
We need pr team, west called it a pogrom which it wasn't since pogrom is targetting 1 community and only them dying.here even though Hindus were targetted they portrayed the majority as the oppressive class.
ah man I've been drawing human anatomy wrong the whole time! I gotta make sure I draw it exactly like the last figure.
Said no one ever. November is the Thursday of the year.
Same only I went to stop and ended up flying over my 2 parked fighters and other rover that were in the grass and crashed into an RWI welding ship let's just say it took out half the welding ship and an axle was all that was left of the rover. Thankfully I was using creative mode tools in survival, I do that, so I just deleted them and am now settling in at a new base.
hmmmmm unoptimized recovery hmmmmmm
Green, cause market is retarded
And is it a large majority here or a vocal minority? No one is out here praising Activision for having the store function as well.....a bloody store.   But people are pissed when its broken and will be vocal in order to get it fixed.
My grow is literalt identical except im on day 8. My girls are so squat i raised my light to get then to strectch in hopes thatbi could avoid the pickle you are in growmie. Lol
&gt; Some folks are very deliberately ignoring the "because you're poor" part of this, which, not so coincidentally, is the part we can control with policy.   Yeah, like Medicare and Medicaid, which we already have
You're welcome!
"I 99 problems but OW AM 97 ain't Yuan"  Crazy you got a pair for that cheap. Obliviously the quality isnt gonna be amazing but do they feel like they'll last at least a bit? Also do they fit small, or were you just unsure on sizing for some reason?
ME GUSSTA EL CUKBIA
ZSS is one of the most poorly balanced characters in the game. I really don't get it, it's like they went out of their way to make her overpowered.
Very nice honey
Not exactly but I've had the urge to take my shoes off, touch the plants and dirt, or caress the mossy rocks behind a waterfall and let it soak my arms. Feels so good to get physically intimate with the Earth.
How do we report price gouging on masks? .99 cent and up store on the corner of Prospect ave and PPW its selling cheap paper n.95 masks for $7 a piece. The guy let me buy 8 after I told him my wife was a doctor. (She's a resident dentist who has been converted to an ER doctor during this crisis)
First off props for all the numbers. But I’m gonna be a party pooper.   Drag is what makes this impossible. We see Sazed store his weight and float out of a tree in the original trilogy. Wax would be doing the same if he didn’t have A-steel.   We see Wax accelerate when he stores weight during a A-steel push because he is actively adding energy to his body at a now reduced weight via the push. Without that, his wind resistance due to drag would slow him immediately.   I personally think the most impressive ability one might gain with F-iron is the ability to fly via a winged suit. Think, bat suit. The only reason people can’t fly with a wing suit (like we all made out of cardboard if you had a charmed childhood lol) is people are too heavy. If we were weightless and had a winged suit we could fly like a bird no problem.
WHAT
Cause u said likes
Pretty funny too lol
Till my lips fall off
A fruit and vege shop had $25,000 worth of stock on hand?
No but maybe
Silver you mean. Why 2? Is it for stereo purposes or not at all?
You use your brain too much. Sometimes the smartest people don't think at all.
Sometimes I throw in some color-correction. I mean yolo, right?
Welp. Only thing to do with that card is own it.   On the plus side, he has full authority to use the phrase "Well, I am what I eat."
When you’re traveling on the me go, it’s a snake on the fly
[Fox News is not considered entertainment](https://www.snopes.com/fact-check/fox-news-entertainment-switch/)
She's actually not as big as this looks. Shes part maine coon so she is l o n g, but some reason, she likes to sit like that.
[If anyone's on the job hunt or not sure what's going on with their current/future company, here's a site that is being updated with reports of layoffs and changes to new hiring for a zillion companies. I can't say for sure how accurate it is.](https://candor.co/hiring-freezes/)
Vote Chef or he will enter your bedroom at night and turn you into a meal for Acrid.
u/vredditdownloader
I want to add some context because I directly sell to the labs performing the testing in Georgia. I sell a different product but work with clinical labs. They have been busting their asses the past couple of weeks. The limiting factor is getting the reagents needed to test. They’re getting over 1k kits per day but the swabs and kits are on back order. I use to work with some of the largest swab suppliers and got a frantic call from a testing lab if I knew anyone. I made some calls and all of them were out. COVID19 is a big problem that we weren’t stocked up for. Everyone is playing catch up and will be for the foreseeable future. Stay safe my friends.
Waiting for the shoes 👀👀😂
Yes. You must be new to the internet or reddit.
Damn, I don't have nekro. I went dragoness without researching them went for ifrit rather than backtracking. It'll be something to go back for once I get the grand ifrit. I'm currently using pale dragon. I was looking at the charmer because its debuffs the enemy as well.
Nothing wrong with depending on cheap medical imports at all. It's not having enough medical equipment for emergency that's the problem
Atheists, at least common ones, are like the infantry from starship troopers using small arms on the bugs that clearly have not been noticing
with a torrent site and a torrent client
Thank you. While it's been known from the beginning, this is a why I never questioned until you gave the answer, then it made perfect sense. 👍👍
You’re right, thank you for helping me change my perspective I really appreciate it!
I'll second this. I will always want my d.o.c. but i also never want to touch it again..
Lol you have a point. How do i deal with this?
Okay so now it's telling me I need a memory stick reader/writer. Seriously!?
Have a baby
Yes it’s way too runny, it looks like it’s a west coast cure which are counterfeit a lot of the time
you're doing great what a voice! keep going girl!
still need this?
Typical boot licker. Can't handle the facts so you want the people who speak the truth locked up.  Sad that Nazis like you still exist.
It’s because UEFA have taken down half the video
r/lostredditors
Cruises aren't that crowded.  I've taken 3 or 4, and there are frequently times when you can find areas of the ship completely empty, just by walking around a bit.  These ships are HUGE!  Especially during the evenings when people go to the shows or during dinner, that means the rest of the ship is pretty much empty.  I found cruises to be an incredibly fun and economical vacation.
Lol you think this dude is super wealthy.  I make more money than this bum
Her name is [Jaye Rose](https://video.search.yahoo.com/search/video;_ylt=AwrS32GU2INe6TQALHf7w8QF;_ylu=X3oDMTBncGdyMzQ0BHNlYwNzZWFyY2gEdnRpZAM-;_ylc=X1MDOTY3ODEzMDcEX3IDMgRhY3RuA2NsawRjc3JjcHZpZANrbWR0anpFd0xqTDVNM0pRWFg3WG5RSUJNalF1TWdBQUFBQlBmbGdXBGZyA3NmcARmcjIDc2EtZ3AEZ3ByaWQDYVNtd1JjRkNTSWlLQzNVeUsuMnpUQQRuX3JzbHQDNjAEbl9zdWdnAzEwBG9yaWdpbgN2aWRlby5zZWFyY2gueWFob28uY29tBHBvcwMwBHBxc3RyAwRwcXN0cmwDBHFzdHJsAzExBHF1ZXJ5A0pheWUlMjBSb3NlBHRfc3RtcAMxNTg1Njk5MDYx?p=Jaye+Rose&amp;ei=UTF-8&amp;fr2=p%3As%2Cv%3Av%2Cm%3Asa&amp;fr=sfp&amp;guce_referrer=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_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&amp;guce_referrer_sig=AQAAANQx34gL1hZt2r5WsQdfyVsBaM14fk6eATCJxUbyI3MFSrCqlzS0l-UYIKDDsO6xd6x4JetcxQLsmnWjMmRuqIqlf8lkXx3YcePuiv0mRQTJuJjmGnurglGVyYcqM0pX7TYDipLWBCxuAnNUXbwoXVgRj2BpYeUb_EO_2PocU1Kx&amp;_guc_consent_skip=1585699090) - pissingporn.pro/video/374352/thick-redhead-teen-pissing-in-public  https://sxyprn.com/jaye-rose.html
Janome sewing machine
Hopefully the Whiskey Dale gave you doesn’t have similar effects
I say go for it!
What's it called ?
He deserved it though
After we get the updated Resident services building and can start buying plots for houses 6-10, can we still encounter villagers on deserted islands? Or do we have to invite them through the campsite now?
Usually unemployment is only for people who were laid off or fired, and you have to be at a job for more than a year to qualify. They recently changed it so that it's possible to qualify for with slightly less time, but definitely not five months. If you had been fired or laid off of your current job AND the one you left in Boston, together that time could add up to a year.  Yes, it seems unfair. It's just bad luck that you quit a job and was only at a job for a certain amount of time before this happened. A lot of people are in the same situation.   That's what the stimulus check is for: people who don't have any other aid coming for them. (Even then, it's not enough to really avoid financial ruin)  You can apply for social security income and food stamps but that will be less than $1000 a month. The post office is hiring, as is Jewel, Costco, Amazon, and most grocery stores. That might be the best bet to keep some money coming in while this goes on.
Do you fully understand the evil you wish to conjure?
Yo I know this
Hi there! Would the family filter block out my boss's homemade porn videos on my work network? Asking for a friend.
Please remember to post a source or artist name for your submission in the comments. Failure to do so may result in your post being removed or you **being banned** for consitently not crediting artists. Thank you for contributing.   *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/MonsterGirl) if you have any questions or concerns.*
Well if you get tested for celiac you will need to consume gluten for a few weeks prior to the test. Which is why I regret it now.   The level that was elevated was their reason on why i couldn't consume gluten. One said i will be able to once i fix my gut the other said i wont ever be able to consume gluten. But majority of all this going on in our gut, not a single person or doctor can tell you what the future is. The microbiome is just to complex and it can change at any point. Every doctor I went to all gave me different answers and different protocols. Each person is different and it all starts from the day your born. So I'll just continue trying to fix it and maybe one day I'll try gluten again just to see what happens. But as for now, I'm going to stay away from it.
This man tattooed his nips . Absolute legend
Very handsome
Ugh,  I swear the shit sometimes Michelle says about Wendell still on social media I am just like sis you could have pulled off the best dumping your ex move on television with Parvati but did this instead.  He ghosted her ass  🙃 gives him one token.
I'd love to measure it with my tongue.
Just 100% did this.
Oh it is 1080p 144hz . Got it on sale   https://www.amazon.ca/AOC-24G2-Frameless-Adjustable-Guarantee/dp/B07WVN6CWT
Shamir best goth gf
It's scrumptious without a doubt!!😍😍
Not even that "The only feature of Zoom that does appear to be end-to-end encrypted is in-meeting text chat."
Your post does not meet the minimum word requirement.  All posts just be at least 30 words.  Please be more descriptive about what you're looking for.   *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/bigdicklovers) if you have any questions or concerns.*
Unfortunately, your submission has been removed because you did not link directly to your image. Please resubmit this using the direct link by right clicking on the image and going to "copy image location" (or something similar) and using that link. All URLs need to end in .png or .jpg. Consider saving the image and uploading it to a reliable image host like imgur.com or reddit if the site doesn't allow direct linking. Thanks.  *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/memes) if you have any questions or concerns.*
Anything that isn't a stubble.
this is what the time travelers trying to stop patient zero said
The r/amitheasshole subreddit and the r/relationshipadvice. these two have the most toxic ppl
I shouldn't have put so much in the washing machine, sorry guys
Good god what's your estimate on your total?
In University I ate "poor man's chicken parmesan" which is chicken nuggets, tomato sauce and a slice of fake cheese. I followed it with "student dessert" which was crushed saltines mashed with jam and peanut butter. It sounds terrible but was sweet, salty and crunchy.... So a great dessert.   My mom always sent tomato sauce, peanut butter and jam in my care package
My sim's daughter died and she got the emotion bomb trait before Grimmy even left 🙃
&gt;Australia is in for dark time’s. They are willing to let you die, burn  and give away your future and utilities to keep themselves in power. Now  the formal oversight mechanism goes offline? Bad. Classic sco mo -  ‘let’s go on holiday’ till fucking August. This government needs to go  The people who need to be convinced of this are not the people on this sub, but the people who still support Morrison and his government. For example, they still [believe that he did nothing wrong during the bushfires, and that the media is ganging up to slander him](https://np.reddit.com/r/AustralianPolitics/comments/fm7l5v/would_bill_shorten_be_doing_a_better_or_worse_job/fl3i22o/?context=100). Some also believe that nothing Morrison could ever do would make him worse than the ALP because [they believe that Bill Shorten is a rapist](https://www.reddit.com/r/AustralianPolitics/comments/fmxw2b/was_it_right_to_defang_australias_trade_unions/).
Any albums like it would be great
Did he?
Viewer discretion advised 😉
Ours is rather dramatic and is often "stuck near a cliff".
&gt;Total bond (VGIT/BND)  VGIT and BND aren't the same thing.  &gt;REIT (VNQ)  Wouldn't even worry about overweighting REITs. 4% of VTI is VNQ.  &gt;With M1 finance it would not fall into a ROTH IRA tax advantage account, right? Sorry if this questions seems silly, I'm trying to figure this out and decide if it would make more sense to setup this kind of pie with M1 or go through a Vanguard or Fidelity intermediary to setup my Roth IRA tax advantage accounts, and use M1 finance to dip my toes in stocks that I'm bullish on and would like to own over time like GGL or FB, OKTA, DISN, SHOPIFY etc.  You can open a Roth IRA with M1 if you want, or a regular taxable account. It's up to you.
Party like its 1999.
The wood workshop bug has been patched.
So you’re saying that your own sense of morality is equal to or greater than that of God’s, or an otherwise maximally perfect entity?
Stolen from ticktok bruh
No just tons of glitter smother the enemy with sparkly doom
And go up to any woman and smell their hair or even better go up to someone’s young daughter and smell their hair and watch how quickly their dad puts you in a hospital. Maybe then you’ll understand what joe Biden is actually doing
Choose domain where you can stay passionate for long and there be multiple paths to flip incase things go south with one. Many folks are into AI these days but they end up sticking deep within narrow scope with nowhere to go.   There are ample programmers around, make sure you are passionate enough to spend extra hours to learn more.
I got the same tip last week thx got it paid out
Looks pretty to me  let's see more of it
Oh how we forget how McGrady was dragging his body up and down the court in Houston after his first season there, as his body failed him and turned into an inefficient chucker. We also forget that Grant was relatively healthy after his first four years and even made the all-star game once. It's a decent comparison. Both had injury issues (Grant was simply out whereas Tracy would try to play but was obviously hampered and ineffective), both had one extraordinary season with a lot of mediocrity, and both were on max contracts with their team trying to figure out a way around them. The big difference was Houston also had Yao with injuries and still had some success. That'd be like those early 2000s Magic teams still making the playoffs with Grant *and* McGrady out. That Rockets team has always been managed so well, up and down.  McGrady's years in Houston resulted in a 105 ORtg (which is a tap above league average), bad shooting numbers, high turnover numbers (somehow higher than in Orlando when he had no one to help at all), and, as always, no playoff success. He was viewed as a bad contract, traded with a bunch of other bad contracts in a 3 team trade to the Knicks, where he continued on as a bench guy, which he didn't just magically turn into upon putting a Knicks jersey on.  Boiling Tracy's Houston numbers down to counting stats tells the wrong tale. It's why no one uses counting stats anymore
u/repostsleuthbot
Beautiful tits
I'm regularly 2 miles ahead of 2nd place when I use my VW Beetle in off-road races.
Pronouns
Bruh
My lap, facing me, that smile is deadly
thanks to this post, I finally got to watch upvotes roll from 999 to 1,000 on a post because of my upvote. Winning.
Authleft has labor camps - counts as genocide. Libleft has voluntary, horizontally organized labor camps - no genocide
Seen Prisma 2 on one dude like it was expected
Most people just usually stare in disgust. This woman is taking it over the line.
[Link to original post here](https://www.reddit.com/r/Playboy/comments/fsbucw/emily_agnes/)
Sacrifice sacrifice sacrifice
r/shrooms
Fuck your ass turns me on
Thanks , it’s interesting to see other styles that people do because nobody is the same . I’m slowly perfecting and dialing in my own style with every model I make. Such a great hobby
I know what you’re saying. But there are loads of things that take next level professional skill that still has 0 interest to people. I can respect the amount of work someone puts in the be at the top of their game but also just think it’s pretty boring at the same time.  *boring to watch
omg i LOVE this idea
Me neither.
Try r/JackSucksAtLife
Maybe thats why there were reports of concrete trucks coming to the island to fill spots on the island.
Coercion. Yes, that too is rape.
Shock ain’t gonna fix that my friend
You can talk about it all you want and even say your going to do it but have second thoughts about it. I'm sorry but in a game like BDO where its alot of time and or money to get GS that I have to lose it due to a grey exploit I wouldn't do it. At the same time I would not advertise me of thinking about doing it. He's a streamer and has to get his views so W/E
Probably the same reason Microsoft did it back in the day, it's a good incentive for people to buy their console. Sucks for the other consoles but money talks with Activision.
I don't need you to "spell it out for me" because by literal definition unlimited has no limit. so I would call 8000TB limit limited
I thought I’d be down for the revised design that came about with Origins. Then I saw it was all about “make bar go up” and loot and I immediately was disinterested.  I haven’t played anything after Unity. That damned PA comic seems appropriate. Something like “I make the bar go up and I feel good, but then it starts over and I feel bad, so I make it go up again so I feel good...”
A thing of beauty
What’s your Minecraft handle!
Thanks! YouTube’s algorithms didn’t surface those
This thread has been removed under the grounds of [Rule 4: Use the Megathreads.](https://www.reddit.com/r/summonerschool/wiki/rules#wiki_4._use_the_megathreads)   Moderators have identified that it may belong in our Champion Pool megathread. * [You can find a link to the current Champion Pool thread here](https://www.reddit.com/r/summonerschool/wiki/megathreads).  ______  If you are still experiencing issues and need to contact the moderators, [please send a modmail using this link](https://www.reddit.com/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2FSummonerschool).
Well more of a grinding. Down going deeorer and wideer  Both. I need clit stim to cum
Boom boom u/lilmixedbunny85 cc u/abdouh15 🦠! ⏰ Here's your reminder from **2 weeks ago** on [**2020-03-17 21:24:57Z**](https://www.reminddit.com/time?dt=2020-03-17 21:24:57Z&amp;reminder_id=f8b786437be54facb16068ce60f4e808&amp;subreddit=Coronavirus). Thread has 2 reminders.. Next time, remember to use my default callsign **kminder**.  &gt; [**r/Coronavirus: Coronavirus_outbreak_in_italy_february_16_3_cases**](/r/Coronavirus/comments/fkckn8/coronavirus_outbreak_in_italy_february_16_3_cases/fks1fyf/?context=3)  &gt; We had our first case in NYC on March 1st.   If you have thoughts to improve experience, [*let us know*](https://reddit.com/message/compose/?to=remindditbot&amp;subject=FeedbackAfterNotify%21%20Reminddit%20Reminder%20%23f8b786437be54facb16068ce60f4e808). ^(OP can )[^(**Repeat Reminder**)](https://reddit.com/message/compose/?to=remindditbot&amp;subject=Repeat%20Reminder&amp;message=We%20had%20our%20first%20case%20in%20NYC%20on%20March%201st.%20%0Akminder%202%20weeks%0A%0A%0A---Server%20settings%20below.%20Do%20not%20change---%0Aaction%21%20RepeatReminder%0Areminder_id%21%20f8b786437be54facb16068ce60f4e808%0A) ^(·) [^(**Delete Comment**)](https://reddit.com/message/compose/?to=remindditbot&amp;subject=Delete%20Reminder%20Comment&amp;message=deleteReminderComment%21%20f8b786437be54facb16068ce60f4e808) ^(·) [^(**Delete Reminder**)](https://reddit.com/message/compose/?to=remindditbot&amp;subject=Delete%20Reminder%20%28and%20comment%20if%20exists%29&amp;message=deleteReminder%21%20f8b786437be54facb16068ce60f4e808) ^(·) [^(Get Details)](https://reminddit.com/reminders/id/f8b786437be54facb16068ce60f4e808)  **Protip!** We have a community at r/reminddit! *****  [**Reminddit**](https://www.reminddit.com) · [Create Reminder](https://reddit.com/message/compose/?to=remindditbot&amp;subject=Reminder&amp;message=your_message%0A%0Akminder%20time_or_time_from_now) · [Your Reminders](https://reddit.com/message/compose/?to=remindditbot&amp;subject=List%20Of%20Reminders&amp;message=listReminders%21) · [Questions](https://reddit.com/message/compose/?to=remindditbot&amp;subject=Feedback%21%20Reminder%20from%20lilmixedbunny85)
Original: /r/sandrakubicka/comments/frz3hd/playboy_babe/
Crazy resemblance
This might just be me, but I’d rather it had more contrast? Also the size difference is still kinda weird IMO. But it looks nice! :)
Whoop de doo, you put yourself on par with a drive through attendant at McDonalds, what is that supposed to mean? My job is also still going, but that doesn't mean I get to say whatever I want and claim it's true without being called out on it.  And please, point me out to where the Constitution grants businesses the right to simplified legislation. Here's a hint, it's not in there. Sure, it should be simplified, but so should the tax code, so should insurance, so should voting, and so should be applying for unemployment or food stamps. None of those are the case, why should we prioritize an entity that only exists on paper over living, breathing Americans?  And you are 100% correct about federal regulations overriding state regulations, when the state regulations are not as strict. However, that is not an explicit override, companies must follow all non-conflicting and relevant regulations wherever they do business. The level only matters when they explicitly conflict and cannot follow both.
No less realistic than the fast &amp; furious franchise.
A fair price for it, the floor's open to trades too
If you have a discord you can send me a DM and add me and I'll screenshare it for you. Works for me
Looks great! 😁
Strategically, as a freshman I'd focus your efforts on smaller stuff.  Big think tank programs mostly want rising seniors (and even then it's tough).  Check linkedin, handshake, Google some stuff, see if there's anything locally, etc.
There's media gag orders on reporting this sort of thing because of how young people who are getting groomed are.  This robbery:  [https://globalnews.ca/news/2431394/youth-accused-in-edmonton-macs-murders-back-in-court-monday/](https://globalnews.ca/news/2431394/youth-accused-in-edmonton-macs-murders-back-in-court-monday/)  The youth was the one who killed as part of gang grooming and initiation.  But because of their age the media is mostly forbidden from covering the children.  All we know is that the 13 year old boy was convicted of first degree murder but given a reduced sentence due to grooming.  As I said, it happens.  But there isn't a lot of coverage due to our gag order laws on the topic.  But we actually have an anti-grooming strategy in Canada because of how common it is:  [https://www.publicsafety.gc.ca/cnt/rsrcs/pblctns/2017-r001/index-en.aspx](https://www.publicsafety.gc.ca/cnt/rsrcs/pblctns/2017-r001/index-en.aspx)  Edit:  In case you don't want to read the full report "Most gangs have initiation rituals based on violence and subject new members to screening and personal testing to confirm their solidness and loyalty. "
En el artículo advierten que si haces este tipo de cosas caes en riesgo de que se vaya el químico a los pulmones y termines con una neumonía, que es lo que mata a los pacientes de covid19. Full circle.
To be fair, yeah, the media is a bit doomer that there is no way this can ever get better, only worse. If it bleeds it leads, and the media does at times make it sound like we’ll all be locked down forever and society will collapse from being overrun by the virus, which does feed panic. The reality is it is gonna be shitty next few weeks, but if everyone follows social distancing, washes their hands, stays home and the governments keep up the legislation any indication says that the peak will come in April, the worst will be over by May, and by May/June we can slowly start to reopen back to normal around June/July.  This is finite and will pass, realism lies somewhere between Optimism and Pessimism.  Humanity is come back from worse (the world wars), and the virus is not a guaranteed apocalypse like nuclear war or unmitigated Climate Change.
+karma no problem
Yeah I do have peaches recipes that I can make such as: peach chair and peach surprise box, if youre interested :]
We will never see the storm destroyed like that in a grand final ever again. They rarely get thrashed too.
I just went to North and there were only 4 cars in front of me. Don't know if i was lucky or what but they didnt seem to busy.
Exactly. I could never have NOTHING to do at my job. I have tasks planned out for months that aren't necessarily waiting on anything but for me to have time to work on them. I come in, put in my 8 (some of which is bullshitting of course) then leave with at least weeks of work planned but undone.
Well now it has.
I kind of wish they went a little more out there instead of just removing the red from the sleeves on the away jerseys. Lots of designs they could have chosen, and I was really hoping for a new barber pole patterned jersey. But I’ll still probably buy one cause those white ones are still super clean.
I never agreed with anybody, i just told you to shut up, so please shut up for the love of all that is holy please stop talking you can't convince me that everybody is a good person and nobody deserves death.  stop replying to this thread.
The Dukw was better and so was the H113
Just flip your phone lol
Nice
Im hoping she comes to some realization about her feelings because it has to be *incredibly* obvious to her that he developed feelings despite him saying he didn't love her earlier.   Or maybe she will throw him a lifeline and ask him again what he thinks.   I find it semi-telling that whenever the subject is broached she doesn't reject the idea. She just dismisses it because of other reasons. "we're rental and client" "he said he didn't and if he did , well that'd be another story" (in what way!?).  She keeps doing things like that which hint at possible feelings but never admission.
Don't do it
Sono un idiota
Fists in the air? Or just like how I did the armored titan
I love Tyrion, so hopefully I get to enjoy them at least some.  It’s really an amazing experience! I love it. Even with their faults, they’re such great books.
For real. XO dickriders
Yeah, the owners are cracking up at that one
You write short stories? That sounds interesting af, Tell me more about it. Please don't do it :') I'll feel even worse bc I get attached very fast to ppl so I care about you already c:
Two Pledge Rings; one for each nipple.
Do you ever gain an ability to craft with materials that are in your storage? Since the crafting feature shows you if the item you're going to make is in your storage it would be nice if the materials were connected like that too.
Also... How TF is the crowd moving??!
#HEY! HEY MOM!  **Yeah you**  ^fuck ^you
Add me psn dreday—2011
Ew.   &gt;he supports the Hong Kong protests.  So... he's literally a US imperialist that wants to re-colonize liberated Asian people that were brainwashed into white supremacist ideology. Fuck that.
Why would he portray Tails like a coward
👏🏾👏🏾👏🏾👏🏾👏🏾👏🏾👏🏾👏🏾
Do I need the sarcasm tag? I thought saying 14 days and a couple of weeks were different things was enough.
Yep
You should definitely consider that sort of stuff, unless you're a government official then you probably don't because you do what your boss says.  Whether you accept aid from the US is a complex question which depends on a lot of factors but at the end of the day  1) you are either sufficiently desperate to accept the aid regardless  2) you aren't in a position to refuse because of the diplomatic/political consequences  3) your country is or was sufficiently close to the US that it's complicit in the things you mentioned anyway  4) the US hates you and is never going to give you anything anyway   Most of the time if you don't like something the US is doing, you send a message via the diplomatic service or you raise it at the UN General Assembly (neither of which are likely to produce results if the US doesn't feel like it)
I’d like to have some visitors. I’m in the NH and have peaches and coconuts. I really need some iron nuggets for my shop but anything is appreciated. DM me for code :)
sick thanks
Can’t the government forcibly shut them down?
It’s an everyday struggle.  Barely hanging on
It sure sounds like it. But if that means seeing that ass I am all up for it 😜❤️.
I hear that, the quarantine thing is definitely making treatment more difficult for me as well. If you do plan on doing exposures on your own on the meantime, the best advice I have is start small and build your way up. You don’t even have to do the thing right away. Even just having it there without doing anything with it (like pulling out the game you used to play or something) is an exposure.
And unless they’re the one removing them for Pooh then they’d have no way of knowing   People love making up laughable conspiracies from scratch
The majority of the british public are fucking retards. The average person in the UK is an utter moron. Its almost fact. Everything else you said is true though. Ha
For the first clip its just bullet spread and the second clip has already been explained by "Goossens43"
Hey man. Just saw you're sick. Hoping the best for you. Hope it's nothing serious, especially with your wife's case. My puppy sends you many face licks in hopes they make you better.   In other words, get better. I need you back to follow your trades :)
OP why the fuck would you do this he's gonna steal shit from you.
It looks like grandma that thing. BLINK MOTHERFUCKER!
I agree so hard but everyday I wake up and I’m like “fuck it, I’ll deal w it later”  Like, I forget  how awful the side effects are and only get excited for the high. Ive been at this for years
Shes constantly mad at him when she should be supportive(I'm rewatching again and am in late second season). I mean come on, its clear the cancer brings him a crisis and totally changes him but she just makes it all about her
TLOZ BOTW
Solipsism explains why they can't comprehend you not thinking like them.
Nope. Nope nope.  They are down on staff themselves due to the virus   They are inundated with payment holiday requests so are moving staff to different department to help   As people start to work successfully from home the service will get better   There are no values working right now. A 60% might not need a valued if your only paying for a home Buyers report, they can get the info they need form National house price index’s
You sound mad...
Found the sneaker elitist
She strikes me as the girl to chew out your carotid artery in my sleep, why would you do this?
Ethics aren't so simple as that.  Are you starving to death and theft is your only option to survive?  Then yeah, not too many people will fault you for some pretty theft.  Normal ethics don't always translate well to disaster situations.  You normally wouldn't squat in someone's house, but if a hurricane destroyed your home and flooding cut your route of escape off then no one should blame you if you break into an empty home for shelter.  You are acting as if the only ethical considerations here are contracts and property rights.  The situation is far more complex than that.    The ethics of it isn't the end of the story anyway.  Even if you think starving people should just starve to death instead of stealing, that's not going to prevent starving people from stealing food.  In fact, your ethical opinions are very likely to go out the window if you are the one starving.  Likewise, people facing homelessness during a pandemic aren't going to be operating under their normal ethical compass.  They will act out of self preservation.
Thanks!
It's because they don't care about that shit like the chuds care about abortion. You have to be anti-abortion to win as a republican, you don't have to be pro-worker to win as a Democrat.
 https://www.instagram.com/acousticalexa/
It’s over now
This post was marked as a question and has been removed to reduce clutter. If your question was not answered please repost in the Weekly Questions Megathread or Weekly Team Building Megathread linked at the top of the subreddit
Tears? Nobody's crying about it. Just pointing out how ridiculous it is since it's programmed, not real life stewards.
A quirk that gives the uses enhanced strength dependent on how the user perceive themselves
It's not the full manga series, which is understandable to some degree, but it would be nice to get the actual volumes.  I'm only really interested in the Paper Mario adaptations so I have no clue if this book will cover those arcs.
That's a racist statement
EEE
I saw your pics without the mask and you are very handsome! And a big Thank You for putting your life at risk to save others!
you've got friends that's a big feat in and of itself
That meduka-senpai face in panel three
I propose they allow it and revoke tax exempt status.
I honestly just built it with all the RGB so I have some way to see when I go take a shit in the middle of the night
Call in sick to work and go back to sleep
This might be better suited to r/sourdough
Can’t relate.. I have a tesla
Claymores?????
Look fat, one day maybe you will be just as smart and just as bright as white kids. You just have to pledge to...you know...the thing.
Hey dipshit, I pre ordered as soon as it went live on Microsoft's website.  I've been keeping up with it since Activision sulport acknowledged the issue nearly 2 hours ago on twitter. Activision should have their shit functioning properly before taking money from people.  I never said I wanted IW to give people the operator bundle, I just said it would be nice.  Which it would be, who wouldn't want a free bundle with skins and blueprints.  That's not being entitled. Chill tf out and relax a little.
Thanks! Luckily after 5 IVs we managed to find some nausea meds that allow me to go to work and not throw up all the time, and it seems to be slowing down the father along I get. My boyfriend is the reason I’m able to be so confident. He really knows how to keep my spirits up! He’s so good to me and so supportive. I couldn’t do it without him
Beautiful
Hummm please sit on m’y mouth :)
Techniquement de la réquisition en France mais bon, si vous y tenez.  Ce n'est pas tant les gringos qui sont pointés ici mais les vendeurs qui, pour reprendre votre terminologie, volent leur client initial.
r/TIHI
Depende. Si la otra persona acaba de decir algo sobre ella y vos querés comentar algo relacionado sobre vos, queda bien.  A: "Soy muy bueno jugando al fútbol".   B: "Yo soy de madera".  Si B dice "Soy de madera", no queda bien.
I had to call clients at work today to tell them about this and it was a weird mix of people acting incredibly relieved and people trying to figure out what the catch was.
Absolutely! Found a lvl 57 moxxies bouncing pair 'nade in a machine and it wrecks.
First off, are you sure you want to? Don’t do it, you always have someone supporting you. I don’t know a good way but please reconsider.
I forgot to mention how the atlanticist is a rhodesiaboo and took BBC's 'Yes Minister' as a manual rather than a comedy show but meh. worth mentioning anyway for those authrights in denial
Maybe it’s just cause I’m from New England but how dare you call it Duncan donuts
Jpow priced in
Steve Irwin and Zaboomafoo are chilling together, stoked about this.
Indeed, ass up first?🐵❤
I'm from Fort Collins and I've lived in Minnesota for the past 6 years. This is what I make whenever I need a true taste of home. I miss seeing everything smothered with green chile here, but at least I can blow people's minds at potlucks when I bring this.
Thanks for the recommendation! Do you know if the roads are snowy or icy?
A better comparison would be to towns like Telluride, Durango, Aspen, hell any town along the I-70 corridor in Colorado.  Or Santa Fe or Taos.  Those towns all have *way* more fur-coat-wearing women with purse dogs than Bozeman has.  Bozeman is not special.  It's just like all the other larger towns in MT or in the west.  LA is a massive metro area and life there is absolutely nothing like anywhere in MT.
Or a butthurt Mozzie or Buck main?  Jäger is one of my most played ops but the Jäger nerf still isn't even in my top 3 of things that I don't like about those patch notes.
lol u retard
I don’t think many teachers out right lie but they don’t tell the full picture. When Learning history we see the failures of nationalisation but communist crimes aren’t taught to the same extent. my point being instead of being taught the entire picture we are only taught half of it.
that was beautiful, it’s sounds like u loved and cared very much
also thats SUPER good camera quality for 2005
Gg
Hahaha it’s a phrase...maybe regional? It is like when you get a crazy hankering to do something
You’re comparing effectiveness of cotton balls shoved up someone’s nose to the same person wearing a winter scarf or a bandanna that looks like they’re about to rob a bank?
Nope
&gt;  then get a rookie QB on a young salary with an experienced Defense and O Line on the back end then I’m game.  This is the hardest thing to do/come by in the NFL, that is basically the dream set-up. Rivers is great for now.
Farmer here.  Canola fits a spot in a crop rotation.  It's pretty much going to get grown anyways, we might as well have increased demand and a higher price for our farmers. Even without China, canola is still more profitable than most other crops (in regions where people grow canola).
Unfortunately it seems that only the first resident player can progress the island story
The circle helps. I didn't know what to look at since it looks so normal otherwise!
Thank god I'm not the only one but I missing so many chatrooms and I just did one where I got a bunch of hearts from seven and hourglasses, and I'm pretty sure it didn't save it :((( this sucks
I got a knife, and I got a dick.   One's going in you, or both are
China is also to blame. They're still hiding all real information about it, and hid the fact that they knew about it from the world for months.
zoz
I didn’t assume anything. I was asking if you actually had a metric for evaluating lying governments or just full of shit. You’re the only one who made an assumption. Ironic isn’t it?
haha i would of gone into a weird pseudo god fearing trip
COMPLETED case fatality. Number of confirmed deaths divided by number of confirmed recoveries.  The people who haven't recovered? They could go either way.  Source: Fifth grade math class.
One guy said something that didn't help and i told him so. Really wasn't being a dick about it. Then some jagoff decided to get his daily dose of internet drama and didn't even bother reading the comments all the way though. Really go look at the thread. He started claiming i was changing my story when the person who helped me solve it suggested something completely different.
Thats is correct .. but by all means show me how raw nature unowned has produced wealth
Instagram: https://www.instagram.com/stephottoyoga/  *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/InternetStars) if you have any questions or concerns.*
That's pretty amazing, do you think you just needed someone to be stern with you or something else?
Yep she has been totally manipulating him and he dont want to see it..  She has been eating Cake from the start.
I'm 39 and I don't have a clue what I'm doing with my 5 month old lol. We're all just winging it in the end.
The one on the left ☺️
Looks like a blinged out Eridin.
To make people aware of it so hopefully respawn gets rid of it
damn she thicc af
works great
Your post has been removed due to an improper title. All titles must begin with `cursed_` or `cursed ` and must not be extremely low effort like "cursed_comment". Please consider resubmitting with a proper title.  *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/cursedcomments) if you have any questions or concerns.*
If that word means “dasani” we are gonna have a therapy talk
  Snapshots:  1. I wonder what #4 is - [archive.org](https://web.archive.org/20200401000007/https://i.redd.it/ep8xnic5k3q41.png), [archive.today](https://archive.today/loadin) *I am just a simple bot, **not** a moderator of this subreddit* | [*bot subreddit*](/r/SnapshillBot) | [*contact the maintainers*](/message/compose?to=\/r\/SnapshillBot)
Yeah I glitched in PvE; not sorry I did it either. This whole fiasco is extremely telling (not only on Massive, but some of the minority in this community).
12/10
That unfortunately wouldn't do much for me
Fall of Nortel. All the workers got new jobs after and all the equipment and offices went to lots of smaller companies.
Ive got one
I am sorry you are going through this.   It seems that you are very frustrated and angry and lost
I meant Chris not Mario. Sorry that wasn’t clear.
Art is happening
I like it! Probably want to consider the fact that the dt would abuse it, like malarkeybot and magic goolsbot.  !sendtweet
bro this looks like a bedroom in a house i was going to move into..
The only explanation I've seen come out was that they didn't want to sign him to an expensive new contract extension, something he apparently wants despite his current contract length
There is a [discussion on Hacker News](http://news.ycombinator.com/item?id=22743138), but feel free to comment here as well.
Its moxxxi
zle
***shrimp***
YTA: "I'm going to be wearing this till I die, sorry if that's a deal breaker"   You"LOL Silly woman is clearly grieving and not serious, but I'll say it's not anyways :D..WHAT DO YOU MEAN YOU WERE SERIOUS? &gt;8c WHAT ABOUT MY LONELY GHOST!?  None of this woulda happened if you took her seriously when she said something bruh
Exactly, and it begs the question: what has he done wrong Mitch?
Omg so pretty!! It goes so well with this hoya, this is my #1 wishlist hoya but I don't think I'm ready for it yet haha
E
Good lookin 10T my friend
and a very tiny roach
How many balls you looking for
r/homeimprovement
If you want a better idea of what's out there, haunt r/mechmarket. There are always fresh boards being posted there at fair prices, especially the TADA68 (my first build) or some of the KBD Fans boards (my work board). I know you can find a TADA68 with backlighting and the plastic case for under a hundo.
https://www.reddit.com/r/dating_advice/comments/fsi1c4/36_questions_designed_to_help_you_fall_in_love/fm2fe4u/?context=3
Stealth Gear is great, highly recommend
chiaki hates women and minorities
Cho move in silence. Jaydo hit not one picture of him online except one a TW member posted on his story but was quickly deleted. Also in a YouTube video he on live with Jaydo and Johno all friendly an shit and when his homie start banging Cho gets mad asl he doing that on live. His recent appearances on DMoney lives are rare for him.  Also heard he was Jarvis’ (Jaro) nephew but idk if it was confirmed. So if he is then he come from a line of real ones.
Halo. I bought and rebought this franchise on 3 diferent platforms over the last decade.
I work at Nike and when I asked about these because I couldn't find anything online with it's product ID my coworker said "they were created during design exercises around the 10 collection while it was still an idea in Virgil's head..."  6 pairs went on sale in the company website that time at theVan.nike.com and I was able to snag 3 pairs.   [link to slack conversation](https://m.imgur.com/a/J9Nmbzv)
No problem, it’s actually a *really* common thing where sometimes you feel like you look like a model and other times you feel like human trash. It’s weird, and I get needing confirmation that you don’t actually look like a sack of potatoes.  So yeah, you have nothing to worry about, you look better than a majority of people, pretty far above average. Just remind yourself of that whenever you feel like shrek’s taint.
What’s the logo for?
Ty for the giveaway OP  I would love to play hollow night or if not indigo prophecy. You wash your hands and stay safe :)
ofc🤤
Added
I mean... they could use Discord or something... We are in an age where we have watches with more computing power than something from 10 years ago; wouldn't be too hard to get a mic from the studio for everyone, set it up in their respected houses, and stream the game "as usual".  Just hindsight talking though, and they all also do have lives outside of the game, so no worries here; just hope they're all doing well.
I had 3 jobs at one stage.   1 paid weekly, 1 paid fortnightly and 1 paid monthly.  Once every 6 weeks or so I'd have a mega pay week.
Ding dong u/6ixSwings cc u/meteorprime! ⏰ Here's your reminder from **1 week ago** on [**2020-03-24 19:30:43Z**](https://www.reminddit.com/time?dt=2020-03-24 19:30:43Z&amp;reminder_id=99446399edb544fba648d7861e0c83ac&amp;subreddit=wallstreetbets). Thread has 1 reminder.. Next time, remember to use my default callsign **kminder**.  &gt; [**r/wallstreetbets: April_puts_bag_holders_so_ya_portfolio_looking**](/r/wallstreetbets/comments/fo642x/april_puts_bag_holders_so_ya_portfolio_looking/fle60fj/?context=3)  &gt; kminder April 1   If you have thoughts to improve experience, [*let us know*](https://reddit.com/message/compose/?to=remindditbot&amp;subject=FeedbackAfterNotify%21%20Reminddit%20Reminder%20%2399446399edb544fba648d7861e0c83ac). ^(OP can )[^(**Repeat Reminder**)](https://reddit.com/message/compose/?to=remindditbot&amp;subject=Repeat%20Reminder&amp;message=kminder%20April%201%20%0Akminder%201%20week%0A%0A%0A---Server%20settings%20below.%20Do%20not%20change---%0Aaction%21%20RepeatReminder%0Areminder_id%21%2099446399edb544fba648d7861e0c83ac%0A) ^(·) [^(**Delete Comment**)](https://reddit.com/message/compose/?to=remindditbot&amp;subject=Delete%20Reminder%20Comment&amp;message=deleteReminderComment%21%2099446399edb544fba648d7861e0c83ac) ^(·) [^(**Delete Reminder**)](https://reddit.com/message/compose/?to=remindditbot&amp;subject=Delete%20Reminder%20%28and%20comment%20if%20exists%29&amp;message=deleteReminder%21%2099446399edb544fba648d7861e0c83ac) ^(·) [^(Get Details)](https://reminddit.com/reminders/id/99446399edb544fba648d7861e0c83ac)  **Protip!** You can use the same reminderbot by email at bot[@]bot.reminddit.com. Send a reminder to email to get started! *****  [**Reminddit**](https://www.reminddit.com) · [Create Reminder](https://reddit.com/message/compose/?to=remindditbot&amp;subject=Reminder&amp;message=your_message%0A%0Akminder%20time_or_time_from_now) · [Your Reminders](https://reddit.com/message/compose/?to=remindditbot&amp;subject=List%20Of%20Reminders&amp;message=listReminders%21) · [Questions](https://reddit.com/message/compose/?to=remindditbot&amp;subject=Feedback%21%20Reminder%20from%206ixSwings)
Except the trade-off is just not worth it. Less damage for something even a slight bit of aim will replace.
Check r/plumbing they have a video of someone using a cutter and torch on 2” glass. Blew my mind because when I cut them it’s 50/50 good or smashed lol
SAY MILK!
Between a chapter and the next one they show a character doing some facial expressions, so i guess you have a bunch of "selfies" in the trophy screenshot
Oh thank you! I appreciate that.
Lol re the fan theory, yeah?  It’s an odd one but I like it, so I choose to believe it  Same with River Tam being a Slayer  And Kayleigh and Inara having sexy pillow fights in between scenes   (That last ones my own personal theory)
~~Jamie~~ Entei wants big boom.
Also have you heard of PSMF? Would that style of dieting, matched with an NSuns workout regimen, pair well with this stack? What do you think?
Let's just conveniently ignore that teen pregnancies have been in steady decline for the last 40 years.
Come on its Reading, were all nutcases
Exactly, this is a ridiculous overreaction. There aren't *that* many AC posts, they're higher effort and more relevant than half the stuff that normally gets posted, and it's not like they're eclipsing some vital discussions. It's literally the same as any other fanart, just done with the AC game as a medium.   We're in a lull between updates, 90% of the popular posts are just highlight videos and killscreens. Nothing special is happening. I see no problem at all with keeping AC posts that are relevant to Monster Hunter. Is it just hipsterism or something?
Ach I could never get behind that flavor. I tend towards the berry flavors the most.
eNViRoMEnTalIst tALkInG pOinT!!!
OK, so you inform them that the lease stands  Here is what I would do:  1. Let them know, they'll be obliged to pay all the rent and it will be accured with reasonable interest. Ask them to pay as much as they can afford   2. On a monthly basis adjust the rent downward to the market rate. This also makes you look good   3. When it's over, you'll be creating a payment plan.   You want your money, so you need to look really generous. YOu may have to go to NCAT or the local court to get an order. This will help you greatly
I'm glad we have people like him. Elon's faults are many but he tries to do what good he can.
He was right about one thing. Eventually we’re gonna be sick of all of that winning.
Get low!
what's it's name
💯💯💯💯💯💯💯💯💯💯💯💯💯💯💯💯💯💯💯💯💯💯💯💯💯💯💯💯💯💯💯💯💯💯💯💯💯💯💯💯💯
zozzle
Yeah.
This is not how fighting works lol
There is a 1 hour delay fetching comments.  I will be messaging you in 6 months on [**2020-09-30 22:59:12 UTC**](http://www.wolframalpha.com/input/?i=2020-09-30%2022:59:12%20UTC%20To%20Local%20Time) to remind you of [**this link**](https://np.reddit.com/r/survivinginfidelity/comments/fgi8yn/where_does_she_get_the_gall/fm2dxnd/?context=3)  [**CLICK THIS LINK**](https://np.reddit.com/message/compose/?to=RemindMeBot&amp;subject=Reminder&amp;message=%5Bhttps%3A%2F%2Fwww.reddit.com%2Fr%2Fsurvivinginfidelity%2Fcomments%2Ffgi8yn%2Fwhere_does_she_get_the_gall%2Ffm2dxnd%2F%5D%0A%0ARemindMe%21%202020-09-30%2022%3A59%3A12%20UTC) to send a PM to also be reminded and to reduce spam.  ^(Parent commenter can ) [^(delete this message to hide from others.)](https://np.reddit.com/message/compose/?to=RemindMeBot&amp;subject=Delete%20Comment&amp;message=Delete%21%20fgi8yn)  *****  |[^(Info)](https://np.reddit.com/r/RemindMeBot/comments/e1bko7/remindmebot_info_v21/)|[^(Custom)](https://np.reddit.com/message/compose/?to=RemindMeBot&amp;subject=Reminder&amp;message=%5BLink%20or%20message%20inside%20square%20brackets%5D%0A%0ARemindMe%21%20Time%20period%20here)|[^(Your Reminders)](https://np.reddit.com/message/compose/?to=RemindMeBot&amp;subject=List%20Of%20Reminders&amp;message=MyReminders%21)|[^(Feedback)](https://np.reddit.com/message/compose/?to=Watchful1&amp;subject=RemindMeBot%20Feedback)| |-|-|-|-|
And UCLA students have much larger dick sizes than average
**PLEASE READ THIS MESSAGE IN ITS ENTIRETY BEFORE TAKING ACTION.  YOU HAVE FAILED TO ASK A QUESTION IN YOUR TITLE**  Your post was removed as it looks like you failed to ask a question in your title. Double check everything, including punctuation, and try posting again.   * **If you're wanting to tell a story or explain something, please try /r/Self.**  * **If you're needing advice of any kind, try /r/advice**  * **If you're looking for a fact based answer, try /r/answers**  * **If you're looking for something that has slipped your mind, try /r/TipOfMyTongue.**  Anything else not covered try one of the subreddits mentioned in our sidebar that better suits your needs.  If you need more clarification, or feel this was an error, please contact the mods and provide a link to this post, thanks!   *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/AskReddit) if you have any questions or concerns.*
thank you kind gentleman
Heard that chef
Messing up is fine bro
Damn you’re serious about trumpets
&gt; It's strange that we don't hear more about Turkmenistan in the news.  * [There's a $10 trillion resource that North Korea can't tap](https://www.businessinsider.com/theres-a-10-trillion-resource-that-north-korea-cant-tap-2017-9)  * North Korea lies on an axis between China (major geopolitical rival), South Korea, and Japan  * North Korea possesses nuclear weapons, perhaps upwards of 60 as of 2020, with at least a few capable of hitting Washington D.C.  * North Korea is also an ideological enemy. Much like China, Vietnam, and Cuba, they are a communist state. Much like China and Vietnam, they don't actually practice orthodox Marxist-Leninism. And much like China and Cuba, they are actually hostile to the aims of the USA (Vietnam being friendly is why we don't mess with them).   * The media decided they're ***the*** "Orwellian nightmare state"  and don't think people have big enough attention spans to care about more than one nightmare state.   Turkmenistan isn't even the worst of the lot. I'd argue that title goes to Eritrea, which has [unironically enslaved most of its population](https://eritrea-focus.org/eritrea-has-second-highest-number-of-people-living-in-slave-like-conditions/) and also ranks [worse in press freedom than North Korea](https://www.bloomberg.com/news/articles/2019-09-10/eritrea-beats-north-korea-as-world-s-most-censored-country). But we don't much talk about Turkmenistan or Eritrea because they have nothing we want in terms of resources or geopolitical value, nor do they have any nuclear weapons.
I'll buy them all for 1,2 mil
I love unity, in terms of parkour and storyline. BUT im playing syndicate again and damn the combat feels like ac4 and open world is fun. Id prefer unity, but syndicate is pretty solid too. Syndicate has this mission set in ww1 which shows that we deserve a game set in that time.
[Source](https://www.pixiv.net/en/artworks/80121788)
Hmm, that might be my issue actually. I never bothered with fishing in the "overworld" because I just spammed traps in the different biomes. Thank you! You've been very helpful
Real cute
Got any other recs?
Well the CDC specifically suggests scarves. I'm no Trump supporter but he didn't just make this up out of nowhere.
literally me after i got the giardia parasite
He took credit for the stock market going up even though the steady rise started well before he was president, so it’s only fair he be blamed for the losses.
I like this response a lot
You forgetting about the Red Wings? Shittiest season in NHL history and they still filling that thing up nearly every night.
Dude, I would love to see that citation. Having $0 payments for 6 months counting for loan rehab would be amazing for a lot of folks
Add me Gt: Odesza432  We got four that are good but need a good big cause ours is now a wing
Apparently he mentioned April 13 as the approximate date for obtaining the antidote for Covid-19. I understand he is making cautious statements so as not to hype up expectations, but this does look very promising so far! I will be eagerly awaiting further announcements from them in the next few days.
At least crop it
Matt Bellamy is regarded as one of the best singers and his breathing is part of his signature. Like it or love it.
We’re both wrong  https://www.visitscotland.com/about/uniquely-scottish/national-animal-unicorn/  William I was the virgin. Glad we got to the bottom of this
Sorry op, but this sub's name is not ironic, it actually is for rare insults. I think you meant to post to r/RecycledCommonAndBoringInsults
I can't tell.  Is that higher or lower than "15 down to close to 0"?
Thanks!
I think that our lovley head mod did not know.  u/DennisX11
Jormungandr has my favourite in it.
It was a good question but my bad bringing ya back to reality we need less of that right now. Want to commandeer a sailboat, sail to the british isles and force Mr. Rowe to write by chaining him to a desk with a type writer?
I’m in Ohio and 20 years ago I straight up stole my neighbor's beagle when it became obvious they were abusing him. He was absolutely the best dog I’ve ever had.
😂😂😂😂 Ok Farrah
I full caos, one Friends is coming
Take 5!
It's a shithole of fascists espousing their views about how the evil jews are going to destroy the white race by making things people enjoy, such as Star Wars and Marvel
 I'm a lesbian,huge fan of John, moreso his solo work than RHCP even, and still have absolutely no desire to sleep with him. If I ever met him I'd rather have a discussion about music.
I disabled voice chat, text chat and quick chat about a year ago. One of the best decisions I ever made.
When she lied about her dad having cancer after she saw me getting comforted by people the day after a member of my family passed away from it.
Reading Harry Potter you will think Snape is the villain  Understanding Harry Potter you will think Snape is the hero  😔😔😔
Let's arrange our positions in bed 😋
Are you okay bro?
That's the eye of the tiger!
This post has been removed because it appears to only contain a link, with little other content. Please repost this as a link post, or if it's self-post Friday, wait until tomorrow.  *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/Music) if you have any questions or concerns.*
Unfortunately another sad tail  of short sighted depression era thinking.
What the hell was this conversation about anyways?
works great
Thank you for the candor, it really does make a huge difference. In the past few days I've tried to negotiate the reality of what works and what doesn't in the new event, and no one has given any leeway in the way of being reasonable. I can understand the growing apathy to DE improving the quality of their releases since Liches, the rest of the year before that seemed good, and every update since has launched in a broken/semi-broken state that encouraged those attitudes. I'm not sure what's been happening behind closed doors at DE that's allowed things to turn out like they have, but the only thing more dangerous than the game coming out in such disrepair, is the community encouraging such apathy. Given, the apathy originally comes from the places where DE has failed, but recently the resentment has become so much so that this subreddit seems to completely dis-acknowledge any good things that DE does, exacerbate the bad things to the point of bullying sometimes, and as of late, twisting the image of the game towards an unfix-able, black void of terribleness that is beyond redemption. The posts for Scarlet Spear on other subreddits like pcgaming had top comments warding people away from the event like it was a quarantine zone. There are some definitively good things about this event like how easy it is obtain Arcanes, but people I've talked to deny even simple things like the despite overwhelming evidence. When we get to this point where people refuse to respond with hateful emotions rather than reason, it is hard to steer back.  I understand your frustration, I do, DE needs to iron these kinks out sooner (This new situation with work-from-home does make me more sympathetic to their plight when it comes to bugs in the near future, but understanding this won't makes the bugs any fewer). But you just being honest about your feelings like you just did undid a bit of that animosity, and channeled it into something that makes the dialogue on this forum much better already. If you don't believe enough in DE to fix their game, at least have the confidence to be able to engage with the other people in the community candidly about the kind of things you displayed here. Sarcasm only sets us back into bad ways. Bit long, but thanks for reading.
You live in Georgia?
😏😍
*Time to abandon ship*
Here I am, captain!
Bolsonaro arregou de suas posições da semana passada. Falou da cloroquina somente para se justificar em alguma coisa. Até ontem suas declarações eram para conflituar. Agora, nesse pronunciamento, quis ser mais racional. Essa mudança de postura é estrategica, porque não reflete a opinião dele. A população mediana avaliará isso como falta de firmeza e fraqueza política.
Bird box!
I like to be able to see as much of a game as I can  I view The trophies as a sort of challenge for me to do, I also just really like progress, and the feeling of getting a platinum from a game I really enjoy is quite nice  I'd have to look at my list of platinums, but what's most likely my favorite is bloodborne, such a fun game and so much so it will remain in my memory as long as I live
Lol
That would be one HELL of a paper cut I already feel bad for your asshole.
Neat what’s in there
Not even close to the weirdest fetish
Cereal? Can I have something different? I’d like a snickers too.
In what world is it accepted to bring a gun into someone's bedroom while they're asleep?
?*
No, I said they aren’t citizens, not that they don’t have any rights...which is a pretty obvious difference if you understand what those words mean.
That’s super cute!!! I love the table and chair. It’s funny what fibro makes us appreciate, like simply drinking tea outside in the sunshine. I definitely relate to that.
Oh I dont use OneNote.. .OneNote 2016 (older version) because you can save locally and to the cloud (by saving to one drive)  OneDrive "syncs" - so a copy is local to your machine and in the cloud for your "Personal" files :)
That's one beautiful art, you're amazing!! I wish I could make one as good as yours, but I'm one of those people that are too impatient with themselves and want to be good at something right at the start. However, playing WoW means so much to me and seeing your art reminded of that. I think I can try to give myself time to get better. (Sorry for the story, hope you don't mind)
&gt;an alpha male with good looks, personality, and confidence,  Trump is not this so I doubt the women he did it to were willing.
The rifle the police placed there was inoperable and not even the same rifle that the murderer left there, just looked the same.
I have a firm rule. To paraphrase the late George Carlin, I never buy anything from AliExpress/Alibaba than I plan to take, smoke, drop, shoot, snort, rub into my belly, or whatever.
Welches Abendland 🤔
Blood fucking red
The r/names are a confusing identity and to be quite honest far too many rules governing usage of other people’s pages . You need some kind of mass simplify of rules , &amp; your presentation layers need some clearer sign posting for the newbies . I would say tidy up the the navigation and make things simplistic as a newbie I struggled and didn’t have a clue where to start  . Although I can see how it’s evolved over time , with dealing with a growing base you end up patching and rerouting problems  to deal with the influx . But eventually you need to restructure navigation and architecture before you get even bigger otherwise you’ll be chasing your tails forever . Regards The Doc.
All the time. If you don’t educate yourself then you’re just a republican.
Hello doll
Could you link the story for ya boy. Thanks
That's definetely not true
spelling
[We are spam filtering all comments by default in response to increased aggressiveness and unpredictability of “Anti-Evil Operations”](https://www.reddit.com/r/WatchRedditDie/comments/fkljr5/rwatchredditdie_will_now_spam_filter_all_comments/)  *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/WatchRedditDie) if you have any questions or concerns.*
Oh I’m speculating. Sorry I should have been more clear.
I am being downvoted because the 50 cent army is in full force on this subreddit.
Hi /u/deadlyxdahlia! Get **Verified** to post original content on this sub. The instructions can be found [here](https://old.reddit.com/r/cleavage/comments/f93t18/get_verified_flairs/)  *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/cleavage) if you have any questions or concerns.*
They were using photos they pulled off some guys Instagram, not their own. That's fraud.
Dont want to publicly post their name so I'll PM you
Trying to be upfront with Lotus didn't work...maybe Hunhow is trying a different approach?
Same!! I also miss Felix/Syvester and the british narrative creator (I always forget his name).  Also Clementine, Teddy and Angela :( and many more I could not remember rn.
its been 135 since 23rd march.  the 22nd was 93
Did you stop when you found a mountain or a tall tree or you gave up?
Yeah these look like bad fakes, swooshes look terrible and the shape as a whole looks like something straight off DHgate. New loves have 8 lace holes, jewel wings logos (unless they are the new remake but these aren't those), and are a mix of nubuck and leather while these are 100% leather and really really bad looking leather at that. Plus the soles look a lot thicker than they should.
Tagging gives you peekers advantage on your angle
Ajna Chakra (third eye) is there, it is in the center of the head (roughly) with a pole between the eyes, and one at the brainstem.   As the Sahasrara Chakra continues to open like a flower, the images projected into the Ajna will progress, and finally nothing will appear in the Ajna, it will be complete nothingness.
Why must Rhythm Saber be played inside The Black Lodge?
Iconic
it's a meme fashion style Digibro made up
Disclaimer: this is intended for Grandpa Joe; not the legend of Jack Albertson (RIP)
R.I.P.
A day may come when the circuits of Droids fail, when we forsake our Clankas and break all bearings of fellowship.  But it is not this day  An hour of meatbags and shattered wrist rockets as the Droid Command Ship comes crashing down  BUT IT IS NOT THIS DAY  THIS DAY WE FIGHT By all that you hołd dear on this good planet I BID YOU STAND! DROIDS OF GEONOSIS!
muricans. cuz of my asian background
Some may even call it a disease 😂
That's interesting. Never seen this comic and I read a lot of Spidey during my whole life. Is this something recent?
The villain. If i recall, you kill someone she cares about, she tries to kill you, and the birds attack her and she stumbles back for about 8 seconds then falls and dies.
If you have access to a primary care physician and have some sort of non-emergent medical need - go to your PCP or a walk-in clinic, not the emergency department.  The Emergency Department (ED) should be for emergencies that are going to result in loss of life, limb, or function. There's always going to be people for whom the ED will be their source of primary care for whatever reason, but if you don't have to - don't go.  Also, if you end up in the ED and have a long wait time, please be patient - nobody wants you to be there for a long time but there are only a certain number of beds and sometimes people have to stay for long observations so they get backed up.  \*\*In the time of COVID-19, please stay away from the ED even more so unless you absolutely need it.
i dont know how to do it either.. I was just guessing u would need influence as usualy. How do u get clan partys anyways?
😍😍😍18-20
Hi, /u/corcaigh, your post breaks [the rules](https://www.reddit.com/r/funny/wiki/rules) of /r/Funny, and has been removed for the following reason(s):  Rule 3 - No reposts.  * [Read more here.](https://www.reddit.com/r/funny/wiki/rules#wiki_3._no_reposts.)  ---   - Repost - Removed  *If you feel this was done in error, or if you would like further clarification, please don't hesitate to [message the moderators](https://www.reddit.com/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2Ffunny).*
Anyone have any luck finding this I called walmart and gamestop and they dont have it
best tetris friends clone????????
I SMELL PENNIES
This thread has been flaired as *[Serious]*. Please be aware that this marks it as a place for serious discussion only and that any unserious content in this thread will be met with [infraction point(s)](https://www.reddit.com/r/teenagers/wiki/rules#wiki_point_system.3A). If your comment does not contribute to the discussion in a serious manner it will be removed. Please report any comments that do not respect this rule.  *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/teenagers) if you have any questions or concerns.*
Oh thank god!
Even 10,000 still doesn’t make it worth it. Fuck that life
I have  Knitted grass backpack  Leaf umbrella  Natural garden table  Wooden block table  And wooden bucket (they are all DIY recipe!) Do you want any?
Cool, and creepy! The outline is neat too, did you make it using some kind of filter?  Let me tell you what the two characters remind me of:  [https://4.bp.blogspot.com/-xwM3cUqIh8w/TeRK4V8UA0I/AAAAAAAABkQ/T1o7yuB3Yt4/s1600/ubik19.jpg](https://4.bp.blogspot.com/-xwM3cUqIh8w/TeRK4V8UA0I/AAAAAAAABkQ/T1o7yuB3Yt4/s1600/ubik19.jpg)  Anyone remember the TV series "Reboot?" [https://www.inwap.com/mf/reboot/cast/images/BobWallpaper.jpg](https://www.inwap.com/mf/reboot/cast/images/BobWallpaper.jpg)
Jeez, they really did let you guys out of prison due to Covid-19
Nice! I have a plant that looks like your one in the dog pot, do you know what it is? cause I cant figure it out, some kind of aloe maybe?
\#025 - Pikachu  You seriously need to look up who Pikachu is? Like you don't know the literal face of the franchise? *sigh* When it smashes its opponents with its bolt-shaped tail, it delivers a surge of electricity equivalent to a lightning strike.
I’ll let it sit then. There are plenty for less and plenty for more. Most that have number matching box NA are priced around there :)
Google tells me that the average household income in AB is close to $100k.  This is exactly my point.  You’re doing a great job making ends meet on single income and 3 kids.  There’s no excuse for people with less kids or more income to have difficulty saving an emergency fund.  Most Albertan households should be able to do it, but most of them haven’t been doing it because they just spend every last penny they earn.
Yep, or the highways in Alaska during the summer.  You drive about 50 or 100 miles and then there's a 15 or 30 minute wait because construction has reduced the highway to one lane.  At first I asked myself what's wrong with Alaska highways?  And then I realized they probably have an unending Sisyphean task:  repair the highways all summer long, then winter comes and next year they've got to do it all over again.
Not reeally dude i havent biught the last 2 or 3 cods but i would buy mw2 remastered if they did multi p lauer.  I couldnt give 2 shits if MW4 or MW53234 or whatever number there fucking up to has some old maps.
I just copied and pasted this into every required text box when it asked me for work search proof/reasons why I did not look for work:   &gt; Individuals filing an application for benefits from March 15, 2020 until May 2, 2020, will not be required to complete the work registration in Employ Florida. **Even though you may be prompted to register, and you may receive messages on screens in the CONNECT case system, you do not need to complete the registration if your application is filed between March 15, 2020 and May 2, 2020**. - REEMPLOYMENT ASSISTANCE COVID-19 FREQUENTLY ASKED QUESTIONS  I also included [a copy of their Coronavirus Assistance FAQ](http://www.floridajobs.org/docs/default-source/reemployment-assistance-center/ra-covid-19-faqs-eng.pdf?sfvrsn=805543b0_14) as an attachment and submitted it with my payment request for good measures. The FAQ specifically says the website might still ask you for work search registration.. of course.
I watched the first fifteen minutes and was like nah I’m good fam.
I feel like it would be more overt.   I think most of this can be chalked up to a cocktail of stupidity, cruelty, narcissism and incompetence.
Nice, thank you.
Ahh freedom
You are guilty of the very thing you're accusing me of. We can point fingers all day saying each other is ignorant. But ultimately what this comes down to is you want your fear to outweigh my human rights
Amazing
&gt;Incel talk  Ah yes, the incel. Notorious for defending consent and being aware of people needing to give it before being kissed. Ok buddy.  I'm not saying every single case out of the 22 are true. I'm saying two (his wife and the business woman that sued him) for sure are and that he got those dropped with NDAs and legal settlements that basically made them say their statements weren't true. He had his wife sign an NDA that didn't allow her to say anything about the marriage or anything that concerned it. How's does that not throw up a red flag? If those two are true, I'd wager a good amount of money that some of the other 22 are, which isn't including the beauty pageant contestants he admitted to popping in on because he, again of his own admittance thinks he can get away with it. He's a sexual predator at the least and a rapist at the worst.
It's not necessarily about 5x the money, it's the fact that Military forces have been, in some instances, given away below cost sadly
Oh you're saying to keep your finger off the trigger when not about to shoot?   Looks like we got a badass over here 😎👌👌
These are things Biden is doing. Blaming people for noticing the words he says or lack there of is no ones fault but Bidens. This is the same logic as trump supporters constantly excuses his own clear mental decline
For skin fans there are actually some nice blue skins this time. For a blue the awp, cz, and deagle are all really good imo
The wait is killing me  - Aerith
I actually just got the PK-5 recommended to me earlier today! Problem is, all of those items are discontinued and I can’t seem to find any anywhere, even reverb. Any ideas?
Callen could easily be the gay friend rogan spoke on. Hes very comfortable getting nude with men. It almost like he really enjoys it...
it *does* look like the virus will be getting a second season
STICKY FINGERS!!! ARI ARI ARI ARI ARI ARI ARI ARI ARI...ARRIVEDERCI
How is the game day experience there?  Considering doing buffalo, Rochester, and Syracuse on a trip to the HOF later this summer or next.
They have said that, they're just not saying it anymore.
Well jailbreak it and download the .ipa from github.com/PopcornTimeTV/PopcornTimeTV
Even international flights with the travel bans? I have tickets to Paris in July, which is looking less and less likely to happen.
ENCORE
Well you just gotta make him hungry first
I wish the info was more common tbh I never knew until I experienced it, I've been a cat lover since a kid but I thought I was locked out because I was allergic now I'm chilling with my 3 lovely kitties   The first bit does suck admittedly though
He did a China travel ban pretty early that we called racist.
Here we go !
Thank you 😊
eat some wild onions
I'll let him know! :)
Yes, we bought one at the start of this.  I figured we could use it to determine when we were just feeling sick and when we were actually no-kidding in danger.  Various articles about coronavirus patients suggest that an oxy sat below 94% is worrisome and one below 90% is VERY BAD. Amazon seems to have sold out for now.  If you're curious, [this is the one I bought.](https://www.amazon.com/gp/product/B000ORVXPA?)  It was about $35.
There is nothing to say people can catch it again. Then tiny amount of caught it again cases can be explained by unreliable tests.  Same with the spreading for an unknown time. Multiple tests would have to be done because tests aren’t foolproof, but once they can no longer detect the virus, and the person has clearly had it and has antibodies for it, I don’t see or heard any doctor say they could still spread it.
Love me some soft fat pussy!!
Someone compress this to 240 x 120, add a red border then post it on r/politicalhumor with the title "Cheeto never stops cheating"
The comment you went all "RAAWR SOCIALISM" was merely pointing out that its really bad to have a profit incentive in criminal justice systems.   I dont see how you can disagree with that. Do we even need to talk about private prisons and what a fucking disaster they have been?
apparently, he can’t kill or stop him in jail.
I'm sorry. A *shi&amp;y* pro wrester.
Looks good
That's why only the greys and black work. Also black dye isn't that easy to come across, compared to grey or light grey dye.
I am so tempted to try and build this now.... Lol
I'm not haha. Just someone who happens to be articulate. I appreciate that though, I do technically do counselling in a sense, but it's in a psychedelic context and I'm not really sure anyone's interested in that here haha. I really do appreciate the compliments though, you've got a way of making me happy. I do have a fantastic role model though, my mother's a psychotherapist and works with hypnotherapy too and she's the most people-savvy human I've ever met. Learned so much about people and relationships from her
Let me get this straight, White House is saying min 100k is deaths now, up to ~240k *”if we do things perfectly”*?? Why the pivot? Why couldn’t they have just acknowledged this was a possibility **WEEKS** ago instead of fucking downplaying this? Right, because “Like a miracle it will soon be gone”, and “we only have 15 cases, and soon it will be zero”.. Riiiight.. I forgot.. I may have to go to my bro’s for awhile, I may need something a bit stronger tonight than shit that can be measured in proof..
Correct /u/CaptainPickle23
Aw man you know I read that as "Mice and Titties".
Just looked it up it definitely looks like that THANK YOU! I’m brand new so I don’t know any stitches really
I did.  It was hard to follow.  You’re right.
My question is:  Isn’t protecting the 2nd Amendment of Utmost Importance?   compared to everything else you mentioned,  we have a social safety net  Abortion is legal and will always be even if Roe is overturned it will always remain legal in most states. (assuming that’s what you mean by expanding reproductive rights)  Dealing with Climate Change is tricky so I will leave that be.   But I can promise you one thing I am NEVER going to be willing to compromise on is my God-given right to defend myself and my family.
Beautiful, nicely done
You knew he was hot during the 1st quarter.  hot during the 2nd.  But you knew it was special the second he hit that half court shot
It seems like poorer countries haven't had much spread yet, because they have fewer travelers to there, so fewer chances of it even getting in the country to begin with. That said, I've heard that things are pretty grim in some developing nations like Iran, for example. But I think we hear about it less because those places have less media and also possibly fewer tests (and therefore less "confirmed" cases)
His pants say yas
There are a lot of risks teens take. It is a parent and school’s job to explain to them the risks and hope they make good decisions in life. Putting a 16 year old behind the steering wheel of a car is scary, it involves the risk of a car accident. You try to educate them ahead of time and hope they don’t push the car to 100 their first time alone. Putting a 7 year old on a bicycle is scary, they can fall off and hit their head or break a bone. You try to educate them and make sure they wear a helmet and don’t do wheelies. Putting a teen on a computer is scary. You try to educate them and make sure they don’t send nudes, bully people, get viruses, or give out personal information.
If you have ground venison, make chili!
hahahaha nice, now flip me off with both hands
Silversmithing/Jewelry.  Lots of the same stuff in the jewelry studio you will find in the lab at a dental office.  Plus the silversmithing you have learn solder very small pieces of wire, and then weave them together for a double loop in loop chain.  Some of the stuff is outdated but you still learn how to cast metal, most dentist's send this stuff out to third party now.  You carve wax with tools that look like they came from the tray at a dentists office.  Also you can learn about chainmaill and make that without using a studio.  Look up Byzantine chainmaill on YouTube there are plenty of tutorials and the supplies are cheap.
Ding dong u/SliideToTheLeft cc u/GENERALKENOBI50166! ⏰ Here's your reminder from **2 weeks ago** on [**2020-03-17 23:29:12Z**](https://www.reminddit.com/time?dt=2020-03-17 23:29:12Z&amp;reminder_id=ebe23a594e9348f5b092070bd1e8545e&amp;subreddit=BattlefrontMemes). Thread has 1 reminder.. Next time, remember to use my default callsign **kminder**.  &gt; [**r/BattlefrontMemes: Lets_all_wear_the_navy_officer_skin_on_april**](/r/BattlefrontMemes/comments/fhnxum/lets_all_wear_the_navy_officer_skin_on_april/fksdohl/?context=3)  &gt; kminder April 1   If you have thoughts to improve experience, [*let us know*](https://reddit.com/message/compose/?to=remindditbot&amp;subject=FeedbackAfterNotify%21%20Reminddit%20Reminder%20%23ebe23a594e9348f5b092070bd1e8545e). ^(OP can )[^(**Repeat Reminder**)](https://reddit.com/message/compose/?to=remindditbot&amp;subject=Repeat%20Reminder&amp;message=kminder%20April%201%20%0Akminder%202%20weeks%0A%0A%0A---Server%20settings%20below.%20Do%20not%20change---%0Aaction%21%20RepeatReminder%0Areminder_id%21%20ebe23a594e9348f5b092070bd1e8545e%0A) ^(·) [^(**Delete Comment**)](https://reddit.com/message/compose/?to=remindditbot&amp;subject=Delete%20Reminder%20Comment&amp;message=deleteReminderComment%21%20ebe23a594e9348f5b092070bd1e8545e) ^(·) [^(**Delete Reminder**)](https://reddit.com/message/compose/?to=remindditbot&amp;subject=Delete%20Reminder%20%28and%20comment%20if%20exists%29&amp;message=deleteReminder%21%20ebe23a594e9348f5b092070bd1e8545e) ^(·) [^(Get Details)](https://reminddit.com/reminders/id/ebe23a594e9348f5b092070bd1e8545e)  **Protip!** You can [add an email](https://reddit.com/message/compose/?to=remindditbot&amp;subject=Add%20Email&amp;message=addEmail%21%20ebe23a594e9348f5b092070bd1e8545e%20%0Areplaceme%40example.com%0A%0A%2AEnter%20email%20on%20second%20line%2A) to receive reminder in case you abandon or delete your username. *****  [**Reminddit**](https://www.reminddit.com) · [Create Reminder](https://reddit.com/message/compose/?to=remindditbot&amp;subject=Reminder&amp;message=your_message%0A%0Akminder%20time_or_time_from_now) · [Your Reminders](https://reddit.com/message/compose/?to=remindditbot&amp;subject=List%20Of%20Reminders&amp;message=listReminders%21) · [Questions](https://reddit.com/message/compose/?to=remindditbot&amp;subject=Feedback%21%20Reminder%20from%20SliideToTheLeft)
There is a [discussion on Hacker News](http://news.ycombinator.com/item?id=22743267), but feel free to comment here as well.
I’ll get em next time
or a yuumi/nami/lulu/zilean/ any enhancer plays on his team.
This was by far the worst box I even subscribed to. The samples are so tiny and most are free at Sephora or off the companies website.
i want a quitter calling card. thatd be awesome to troll with.
We need more of Crim for sure
I found it after it happened
You may need more lightning rods, since a lightning rod only has a chance of absorbing a strike if it isn't already processing a previous strike. Where you put the rods doesn't matter, since they don't protect a specific area, each rod covers the whole farm.
I like this birb :3
🐒🐒🐒
Great progress! But pull your pants up.
I wonder where epicenter was if people felt it in Pullman
Point registered. It will be added to CaptainPickle23's flair in a bit.  *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/GuessTheCoaster) if you have any questions or concerns.*
Shocked Thanos doesnt get a massive stat boost. Hes still as frail as a wet paper towel, even with defense up.   And Thanos' passive is only a 10% stat decrease. They're going to get absolutely butt fucked by Ultron and Black Bolt. Maw hard counters Phoenix so we might start seeing her less
You mean that that is going to sink with all the people on board?
That was only when the music died
Did you know he also has a music career
She just needs to make an Onlyfans and cut the fitness act.
It's Vinsmoke Sanji now, isn't it?
I'll use them, but not a lot. I don't want to wear out those beautiful red ear pads.  And yes, you can wear these headphones the same way Futaba does!
Nice try but this does not belong here.
Play stupid games win stupid prizes
Strat or Tele bridge pickup, fuzz box, spring reverb.
When they are always negative and never have anything positive to say.
Heaven.exe executing correctly.
why did the animation suddenly get better when he was licking her nipple lol
A dime has been dropped, but concrete proof is needed other than someone's word.
Imagine the cost and logistics of transporting every passenger to their place of residence and having 1 guard posted at all of them. It definitely makes more sense to use hotels BUT in saying that - you should be allowed contact free deliveries like anyone else who’s in isolation at home.
I mostly identity myself as an asexual and Jellobug is just atrocious. Also I will call you *yes*
 **Recommended Subreddits:** r/AmazingCurves, r/FitModels, r/AmandaLeeFans , r/AthleticBabes , r/BikiniBodies   *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/fitgirls) if you have any questions or concerns.*
The Mermaid's Daughter, by Joyce Gard. It's about a Roman-era Briton girl picked to be the reincarnation of her tribe's water goddess.
Friendly Reminder that **DPH** is unhealthy and dangerous to abuse in the longterm. [DPH abuse has been linked to cognitive decline, memory impairment, and heart/blood pressure issues.](https://drugabuse.com/hooked-on-benadryl-its-much-more-than-a-harmless-dependency) Please research before getting too involved with ***ANY*** substance!  ***Harm Reduction saves lives!***   *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/dxm) if you have any questions or concerns.*
[Link to original post here](https://www.reddit.com/r/Playboy_Albums/comments/fsc92h/cyber_girl_of_the_month_june_2002_merritt_cabal/)
How old are you 70? My grandmother is the only other person I have ever met that legitimately likes black licorice jelly beans.
&gt; posztó dolog   drbubo.jpg
Original: /r/DemiRose/comments/fs4k7i/beautiful_smile/
Depends What color are you going for?
My biggest problem with the "practicality" of the Apocalypse Gates MC is the plot armor that keeps him from suffering from any of his macho bullshit.
I’d love to rub soap all over that sexy body 😉😘
How many people are on your make line?
He does have solid TDD, I'll give you that. He held Maia to a decision (although why it was split I'll never know), which is super impressive. Usually if Maia gets your back it's just a matter of time.   That said, Woodley was legendary for his TDD before the Usman fight. He's still at 92%, actually. He held Maia to 0 takedowns (he grabbed the cage for two of them, but 2 out of...23? I think, isn't bad) and never got into that situation at all. And Usman grappled him at will. Brought him down twice, pounded him against the fence, won a 50-44 decision against someone with far better TDD.   Jorge is at 78% TDD in his career, and couldn't hold the same against Maia. And he's going to be dealing with Usman, someone who isn't necessarily looking to finish on the ground, someone who is happy to just sit there and pound you for 25 minutes.   For striking, if you look, Usman actually has mostly better striking stats than Jorge. The latter has much fancier boxing for sure, and it's obviously effective, but I wouldn't give him a huge edge over Usman if any. Especially what we saw in his fight Colby (and even some of his fight with Woodley), Usman is not afraid to stand and swing, and he's very good at it. It's not flashy, but it works really well.  Finally I look at their competition. Usman's resume is far better than Jorge's as of late.   Last five for Jorge 3-2: Maia (L), Thompson (L), Till (W), Askren (W), Diaz (W).  Last five for Usman 5-0: Meek, Maia, RDA, Woodley, Colby.  Not only did he increase drastically in competition, he smashed the last two completely in ways that he really shouldn't have been able to, when people were talking before the fights.   Sorry man, Usman just has the edge completely. He should dominate any grappling, should probably at least hold his own standing up (if not take the edge), and that leaves Jorge with a puncher's chance to win. Jorge is good. He's top 5 for sure. But he's not Usman caliber, and until he fights someone that seems like they should be up there, I can't give it to him in any way but chance.  Then again, I might be surprised if they fight. Maybe Jorge just submits him quick or something, or outboxes him over 5 rounds. Very possible. Just very unlikely imo.
God also said to pray in private.
F
Wow their is a new trend these days to shame people in the name of privilege. Like wtf you want me to do?! If we go out then we are tagged as "irresponsible citizen" and if we don't we are considered "privilege brats". Like for the ffs stop being such an hypocrite. They are doing what they have to and we are doing what we have to. Everyone's situation is different and you have to admit that. Smh
That's 2020 for ya
A lot of European countries start to make mask wearing mandatory lately. Even the US CDC is considering that too.
Nice
broo i give up
We did it boys, that garbage pile is no more
Snape was named after a chad Roman Emperor.  James Potter was named after some christian apostle and a pot.
He was setup!
even when it brrrrrs?
https://youtu.be/G5TZ6fTYrsE
Not hard at all.
I love the aspect of it being an island instead of a town like usual, I'll definitely tip you :)
*remembering the street where you "met your next husband while in a rage against your current husband" 20 fucking  years later. Definitely not the only time she walked that street, definitely hooking on the reg
Thank you so much☺️
Never seen a comedian gettin jokes stolen as much as Bo.
They argue that it's actually the Nazis dumping CP then blaming them therefore they haven't done anything. One of their admins even posted a full blown conspiracy theory about it to indoctrinate their light followers.
I’ll do 77 since it eight more than 69. 😎
If they do an exp boost faster.
Thank you! I totally appreciate getting your opinions on this! I’m hoping to workout a bit more too, but I’m trying to make my changes reasonable enough that I’ll be able to keep it up when we get back to normal. Hopefully I’ll find a way to work in a decent workout though like you said. Thanks a ton! 😄
How old are you?
prevention is better than cure.  For instance smallpox comes to mind
Yussef Dayes- Love is the message??
That’s her stage name dingus
If killing can be avoided it must be. If killing is necessary to prevent the death of an innocent then it is acceptable.  So yes. If Nazi Germany is out murdering by the millions, they must be stopped by any means necessary. If a kid hacks into a zoom lecture and says heil Hitler a few times then he needs to be stopped, tendered incapable of doing so again, but not killed.
That's sounds like a really, really great idea
thats pretty cringe
Holy shit that girth tho. Go plug some holes with that tank damn
Listen fucker.  Penis.
F
&gt;I'm the "platonic" SD   🦄 we've got a unicorn 🌟🌟🌟🌟🌟
I'm looking for white mum seeds, white rose seeds, and cosmos seeds of all colours!  I can bring any other flower or fruit you're looking for. I've also got a few hybrid hyacinths (orange/pink/blue) and mums (pink) :D
I slept through the one in '83, and the one we had a few years ago was so mild I hardly noticed it. This one? I noticed it.
ooh gotchu ok
I hate the emoji more than the unironic racism.
Loved her so much, just finished P4 today
Tbh that could be me
Well if you get 3 breads you can make a four!
I just spent some time reading [this](https://www.benjaminlcorey.com/could-american-evangelicals-spot-the-antichrist-heres-the-biblical-predictions/). He seems to fit the biblical description quite well.
Faltan las bendiciones y que sea kirchnerista.
Partially Chinese-owned and wholly Chinese-built are different things. Even so, I never post images of myself online.
It's more of a joke on how bologna is pronounced, and I never even thought about it to any greater extent, but because you brought this up I think I'm going to have to ask him to change how his name is pronounced. Thanks friend.
Add me (if you want): VOiD Mite
Your post has been automatically removed because you did not include a [tag] in the title.  Please read the subreddit rules for more information.   *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/Battlefield) if you have any questions or concerns.*
Can I get a link, or is this just a personal theory?
Sorry, but one hit single in his whole active career begs to differ... and that's only because the song was a cover of the hit single "It's All About You" by Boys Who Cry. Not to mention having a comeback every 10 years is too much even for fans. He's full of potential but branding him "the best" isn't it.  I do have to admit his collab with Spongebob and the Bikini Bottomers shook the whole music industry and will be forever be part of music history.  But have my upvote for having an actual unpopular opinion.
Same
This hurts me more than my father
Ves? te dije que no andes hasta tarde sin campera
My buddy had a 1,000 point 68 Camaro with a 327 2 bbl.  I could do donuts around him all day long.  I'd pull on a 327 4bbl.  Pretty even with a standard 350.  Anything more would give me problems but my next mods were EFI and a turbo.  Sadly I just didn't get to it.
An ambulance ride, a helicopter ride, an IV bag, any medication dispensed from a hospital on a regular basis of inpatient treatment. Making something unaffordable without expensive insurance makes it inaccessible, which is also the result of artificial shortage.
You can tell by looking at it. Why can’t you get wax like that anymore? Cause now CRC is better known so people can tell you if it’s bho, pho, or CRC
Felt a small earthquake in Kalispell MT about 5 minutes ago.
People who view discussion in terms of winning and losing are childish and obnoxious.
Your submission has been automatically removed pending manual approval because your account does not meet the minimum karma or account age requirements of /r/worldnews for submitting from an uncommon domain.   If you are new to reddit, we suggest you read  * [reddit 101](http://www.reddit.com/r/help/comments/2bx3cj/reddit_101/)  * [How reddit works](http://www.redditblog.com/2014/07/how-reddit-works.html)  * [The rules of /r/worldnews](http://www.reddit.com/r/worldnews/wiki/rules)  You may also want to review the [Reddit guidelines regarding spam](http://www.reddit.com/help/faq#Whatconstitutesspam) and the [wiki on self-promotion on reddit](http://www.reddit.com/wiki/selfpromotion).   *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/worldnews) if you have any questions or concerns.*
i sort by "new". i look at posts as soon as they are posted.
   Fresh start! [https://imgur.com/fRDUnp9](https://imgur.com/fRDUnp9)  **Half-point:** [https://imgur.com/Rpc7ICJ](https://imgur.com/Rpc7ICJ)  **One point:** [https://imgur.com/4ElKzay](https://imgur.com/4ElKzay)  **Two points:** [https://imgur.com/Fe5A32t](https://imgur.com/Fe5A32t)
They didn’t finish tho....
Why the long face?
Harry deffo isn't bourgeois - he's upper not middle class
35 different.
No, but it certainly created an unjustified hierarchy out of our condition.
Roses are red memes are neat, I want to die,  Lol yeet
4.5
GOOD JOB!
Whoa whoa whoa the trash cans are our thing in Houston.... I’ve said too much already.   Anywho ya make contact but it’s not good contact and that ball doesn’t get out of the infield. Swing: 900   Pitch: 542   Diff: 358 -&gt; PO
Most women are heterosexual, most kids and parents are blood-related, and most people still make babies by bumpin' uglies. I will assume pregnant women have husbands or at least a male partner because that's common.  Whether or not she wanted him there, he's a grown man who should understand the gravity of that request and its consequences. He probably hid his symptoms because he feared the consequences - being denied access to his wife and kid - and he just hoped he wouldn't get them ill. He gambled and lost, the asshole.
You are the current champion and not those guys...says a lot right there.   Might be selling yourself short.
It really depends on the weather conditions and can be really complicated; especially as they move through different layers of the atmosphere and temperature.  They are similar to clouds which can hang around for very long periods of time depending on the weather. The only reason contrails look so weird is because of how they form off the back of fast moving metal tubes in the sky.
Alguna vez has hablado con algún ciudadano/a de cuba ?
c'est toi encore
Doesn't proteolysis occur in starvation, so op wants a starving girl.
Id say his ability to crash the game was OP
who randomly looks at toes lol
stay off the road it says.   If i go for a ride with my motorbike, do nothing else, how can i spread the virus?
This is amazing!! You have inspired me to create a top for myself after I complete this other project.
Hi luv 🥺👉🏽👈🏽
😍😍😍
Yeah they are selling like hotcakes since the quarantine stuff started. Animal Crossing is pretty much the biggest game out right now, it seems like.
hola, compañero Yo soy cliente de kuailian, y la verdad es que estoy muy contento, si quieres podemos hablar por privado telegram o lo que quieras :), te podré ayudar en lo que quieras
Yes. That is exactly what it is on track for. I guess we go get some **FUCKING MASKS NOW!! LAST WEEK WE WEREN'T SUPPOSED TO USE UP ALL OF THE MEDICAL SUPPLIES FOR FIRST RESPONDERS, BUT IT TURNS OUT THE FIRST RESPONDERS WILL NEED ALL OF THOSE MASKS AFTER ALL. OK.**
You are secretly hoping to be booted it's ok to say it :D
Standard triage?  Whoever has better outcomes gets it first. So they draw a protocol. Usually, something  like this:  Healthiest first. Then... Younger first.  Then... Likely to survive first.  This is more or less what they are doing in Italy. In Spain, they are going a step further. Bad Mental health/physical health last.
I think you can define what that means for yourself. You could define it by having done all of those things, or none, or just some of them.   Just remember that consent is very important. Don’t do anything you are uncomfortable with for the sake of being able to say you did It, (or anything that anything anyone else is uncomfortable with ofc.)
And you are acting like requiring less efficiency instead of more efficiency somehow wont affect efficiency
Can’t speak for all of Australia, but most people I know and associate with practiced good hygiene prior to this pandemic, and as soon as numbers started to show, most of us increased these practices and actually began the whole “social distancing” before it became mandatory.   I think our lower population density helps a bit, there aren’t too many cases outside of the more dense cities.
r/shitpostcrusaders
[Also even though she got a portion of his shares, he retained the voting rights for those shares.](https://twitter.com/mackenziebezos/status/1113851260040503296?ref_src=twsrc%5Etfw%7Ctwcamp%5Etweetembed%7Ctwterm%5E1113851260040503296&amp;ref_url=https%3A%2F%2Fwww.bloomberg.com%2Fnews%2Farticles%2F2019-07-05%2Fbezos-split-finalizes-as-38-billion-amazon-stake-transfer-looms)
Sorry, your [submission](https://www.reddit.com/r/apexlegends/comments/fsogsq/looking_for_someone_who_wants_to_play_on_new/) in /r/apexlegends was removed because the post was not long enough to encourage a meaningful discussion. Please note, this action was performed automatically, and adding characters in an attempt to circumvent this filter will result in an automatic ban from /r/apexlegends.  - Please do not send us modmail asking to manually approve a post. We will not make any exceptions.   *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/apexlegends) if you have any questions or concerns.*
Biggest stock market crash???
What if Speedhawk wasn't screwed over by the refs in the Conference Championship?
Please consider using the search bar to answer this Anki-related question. Repeated or reposted threads may be subject to removal. Filesharing is prohibited in this subreddit, this includes Anki decks which include screenshots or plagarism of copyrighted material.  *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/medicalschool) if you have any questions or concerns.*
Looks so yummy 😋
Tiger King
 Jeepers Creepers 1 &amp; 2 (Reminds me of Mothman Prophecies), The Faculty, Final Destination
Sorry, but this post has been removed for the following reason(s):  ---  **Rule 1: Post Must Show a Malapropism**  Your post has been removed for violating the guidelines on the sidebar as to what a valid malapropism is. Please note that if your post has been removed because it's not a valid word, you might consider posting it on r/boneappletypo  ---  If you have any questions, feel free to [send us a modmail](https://www.reddit.com/message/compose/?to=/r/BoneAppleTea)!
This is awesome. I literally just received my first MIDI controller today. I was going to get the Reason trial first (based on my research that's the DAW I want to start with, because I loved what I saw about plugins such as Scales &amp; Chords), but a 90 day free trial is hard to pass up. Might as well try them both, even if I already suspect I'll be sticking with Reason in the long term.
Mogs me. I'm 25 and have never had a real job.
That nice
I re-read it in what I think your brain thinks is a Swedish accent.
You guys are gonna be together a loooooooooong time hahahaha :) super cute!
I blame both.  It takes fools to make a vapid nothing a celebrity, and takes a vapid celebrity to take advantage of the fact that there are fools. Two sides of the same fake crappy coin.
What's to figure out? He agrees with me!
Busta Bust still the man
Wtf, no pickles
You need the Online app to actually use QR codes. So, I'm pretty sure that you need to pay.
yes. welcome to hell
No I'm talking about Xi:  &gt;In May 1966, the Cultural Revolution cut short Xi's secondary education when all secondary classes were halted for students to criticise and fight their teachers. Student militants ransacked the Xi family home and one of Xi's sisters, Xi Heping, was killed. Later, his mother was forced to publicly denounce his father, as he was paraded before a crowd as an enemy of the revolution. His father was later thrown into prison in 1968 when Xi was aged 15. Without the protection of his father, Xi was sent to work in Liangjiahe Village, Wen'anyi Town, Yanchuan County, Yan'an, Shaanxi, in 1969 in Mao Zedong's Down to the Countryside Movement.
&gt;Of course people are idiots and the system is corrupt, so over time people would sell their farm.  Of course, people would sell their farm because the buying price was high enough for them to benefit.  And a lot of people would rather take that money and become something else rather than being tied down one choice of occupation.
Second gear is good as long as you still have forward motion and momentum. Stay in 2d, and give it a little bit of gas to maintain momentum. There is no need to go into first as long as you rolling.
There is probably an option in the settings depending on what video call application you're using.
ew no
respeKt
Come one, come all, to the circus freak show! In this ring, we have a fascinating specimen, The Man Who Can't Read Context! Watch as he completely misses the fucking point! The ability to see him comes free with The Missing Link tickets!
Well that escalated quickly
Haven’t paid mine for years... the BBC don’t program anything decent enough to warrant paying them anything.
shoot, a year ago when i was training on my own i didnt know of the split. thank you!  ill be sure to message you for anything  &amp;#x200B;  edit:its really hard for me to eat more, but ill make god damn sure to give it my all.
Touched the hot hob (at least 5 separate times)
What the ip
‘‘Oh and he botches it’’
That’s a good question. I suppose from a booking standpoint, not really. However, one can assume he is in a better position having the creative freedom in AEW and running his wrestling school. Of course, I don’t know the guy personally but considering he’s not burying AEW and wanting his release every day on Twitter, he seems better off.
Leak leak leak leak leak
MHW:IB  Just got lightbreaker axe, the sharpness leaves a  bit to be desired. Tips on getting handicraft without sacrificing much? Suppose I could switch from attack charm to handicraft charm.  Just wish Safi weapons weren't so much stronger.
Got it! Thank you!
There is a [discussion on Hacker News](http://news.ycombinator.com/item?id=22742733), but feel free to comment here as well.
Contrary to your assertion, quite a bit of helpful advice has already poured in
Slime, Slob, Sanctimonious, Scum, Shady, Shameful, Sickening, Sleazy, Snotty, Sack of Shit.  Take your pick
They are not the high risk group but they are damn good carriers.
works great
No are you?
For real, I have a slight lazy eye and it fucked me up putting that on lol
Don't get disheartened if it takes time to get into the game. It's a super steep learning curve but once you've got the mechanics down and pull off your first strat it's a feeling like no other
Ahh I have most of these furniture items and am going for a similar vibe - so cute
I bet they weren’t the first pints of their day...
